Source,Title,Headings,author,Published,Publish_Day,Publish_Month,Publish_Year,Publish_Time,Read_Time,Article
HuffPost UK,Desperate Rishi Sunak Goes Full Project Fear As Tories Brace For Election Wipeout,[],Kevin Schofield,1 July 2024 at 5:30 am·2-min read,1,July,2024,05:30:00,2,"Rishi Sunak is in panic mode with less than a week until polling day. WPA Pool via Getty ImagesA Labour government with a huge majority will rig the electoral system to keep themselves in power for “decades”, Rishi Sunak will claim as he tries to scare voters ahead of polling day on Thursday.The desperate prime minister will even say Keir Starmer - the former Director or Public Prosecutions - will give prisoners the vote to stay in power.He will say there are “four days to save Britain” and repeat discredited claims that Labour would put up taxes by £2,000 per household.Sunak’s bizarre comments, at an election rally on Monday night, come as opinion polls continue to predict a Tory wipeout.Elections guru Professor Sir John Curtice told the BBC on Sunday that the Conservatives could be left with just 100 MPs, compared to Labour’s 450, come Friday morning.In a last-ditch attempt to avoid annihilation at the ballot box, the PM will beg voters not to hand Labour a “supermajority”.That is despite polling evidence that tactic has backfired by making voters more likely to back Starmer’s party.The PM will say: “We have four days to save Britain from a Labour government.“Labour would hike taxes by more than £2,000 for every working family, would shunt our politics to the left and change the rules to ensure that they can stay in power for decades. “If they get the kind of majority, the supermajority that the polls suggest, they will set about entrenching themselves in power.“They will rewrite the rules to make it easier for them to stay in office and harder for anyone to replace them.”He will add: “We already know that they want to give 16-year-olds the vote. They don’t want to do that because they think they are adults, but because they think they will vote for them. What other changes will they make to make it harder to remove them from power?  “Votes for EU nationals? Votes for prisoners? A whole new voting system designed to allow politicians to stitch things up behind closed doors and shut you out? “Don’t let them do that. Don’t take that risk. Don’t surrender to Labour.”The prime minister’s warnings are similar to the unsuccessful scare tactics - dubbed “Project Fear” - used by the Leave campaign during the 2016 Brexit referendum.Related...Rishi Sunak Has Insisted He Is 'Proud' Of The Tories' Disastrous Election CampaignRishi Sunak Left Squirming As He's Confronted With Ordinary People's Lives In Tory BritainHow Even Traditional Tories Are Determined To Boot Rishi Sunak Out Of Downing Street"
Yahoo News UK,The Tory ministers and 'big beasts' who could lose MP seats in the electionSeveral big names in the Conservative Party are at risk of losing their seats in the general election.,"['Grant Shapps', 'Penny Mordaunt', 'Liz Truss', 'Jacob Rees-Mogg', 'Johnny Mercer', 'Victoria Prentis', 'Alex Chalk', 'David TC Davies']",Andy Wells,Updated 20 June 2024 at 3:51 pm·5-min read,20,June,2024,03:51:00,5,"Rishi Sunak could become the first prime minister to lose his seat in a general election, according to new bombshell polling.According to the Savanta poll, which was commissioned by The Telegraph, the Conservatives are projected to win just 53 seats in the general election. Some three-quarters of the Cabinet would lose their seats in that scenario – including Sunak.Were Sunak to lose his seat in Richmond (Yorks), it would make him the first prime minister in history to lose their seat in a general election, according to the Institute for Government. Chancellor Jeremy Hunt is also facing a battle to hold on to his constituency, with the vote on a “knife edge”.Savanta spoke to around 18,000 people between 7 June and 18 June for their poll. If reflected in the election, Labour would be on course to win 516 seats, with a commanding Commons majority of 382. The Liberal Democrats would have nearly as many seats (50) as the Tories.Jeremy Hunt: My constituency is on a knife edgeHunt could be among the Conservative casualties on the night of the 4 July poll, despite his newly-created seat in Godalming and Ash currently holding a Conservative majority of more than 10,000. He is facing a battle to win the seat in Surrey, with the Liberal Democrats keen on taking a high-profile scalp.Several other Tory ‘big beasts’ also face a tight vote to hold onto their seat, according to a major poll by Ipsos.Grant ShappsDefence secretary Grant Shapps may lose his seat in the election. (Getty)Defence secretary Grant Shapps, who had been touted as a potential leader of the Conservatives after the election, is at risk of losing his Welwyn Hatfield seat, according to Ipsos. Their polling suggests a likely Labour victory, with Sir Keir Starmer’s party currently on 48%, compared to 28% for the Conservatives.Shapps won the seat in the 2019 election with a vote share of 52.6%, increasing his majority from the previous election.Penny MordauntPenny Mordaunt’s seat is at risk from Labour. (PA)Penny Mordaunt, the leader of the House of Commons, is another Tory MP whose name has been mentioned in a future leadership contest – in the event of the Tories losing the election. However, she may not even be an MP after 4 July as her Portsmouth North seat is at risk.Seen as “leaning Labour”, polling suggests Labour are on 42%, compared to the Tories on 34%. She won 61.4% of the vote in the 2019 election.Liz TrussFormer prime minister Liz Truss may not be an MP after the election. (PA)Former prime minister Liz Truss is at risk in her South West Norfolk seat. The seat is seen as a “toss up”, with Truss currently in the lead at 31%. Labour are a sitting at 27% but Reform UK are polling 30%.Allowing for margins of error and another two weeks of campaigning, the seat will be hotly contested between all three parties on 4 July.Jacob Rees-MoggJacob Rees-Mogg is on track to lose his seat at the general election. (PA)While no longer a government minister, Jacob Rees-Mogg losing his North East Somerset and Hanham seat would perhaps be one of the night’s bigger surprises. Rees-Mogg has been an outspoken critic of some of Sunak’s policies and is a regular presenter on GB News.However, the Ipsos poll has the seat, which has been newly-created for the 2024 election, is currently showing a “likely Labour” win, with the party on 47%, compared to 30% for the Conservatives.Johnny MercerPolling suggests Johnny Mercer will lose his seat to Labour at the election. (PA)Veterans’ affairs secretary Johnny Mercer is standing for the Plymouth Moor View seat, having last won the seat in 2019 with an increased vote share of 60.7%. However, a “likely” Labour win is expected, with a projected vote share of 49% on 4 July. The Tories are currently polling at 30% – half of what they won in 2019.Victoria PrentisAttorney general Victoria Prentis is currently facing being replaced by Labour in the election. (PA)A “likely” Labour victory is predicted for Banbury, a seat currently held by attorney general Victoria Prentis. The Tories are polling at 30% in the constituency, compared to 40% for Labour. Prentis is notable for being the first British MP to take a Ukrainian refugee in her house following Russia’s invasion.Alex ChalkThe Libreal Democrats are projected to take over justice secretary Alex Chalk’s seat. (Alamy)Justice secretary Alex Chalk won 48% of the vote in the Cheltenham constituency in the 2019 election. However, the seat is now leaning to being “strong Liberal Democrat”, with Sir Ed Davey’s party polling 60% of the vote. Chalk and the Conservatives are projected to win 26% of the vote, according to Ipsos.David TC DaviesDavid TC Davies is projected to lose his seat in the general election. (PA)Welsh secretary David TC Davies is facing a “likely” Labour victory on 4 July, with the party projected to win 45% of the vote, compared to 30% for the Tories. The constituency has predominately been held by the Tories, with Davies himself representing the seat since 2005.Your guide to votingHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhat voter ID can I bring to the election?Who is standing in my constituency? Full list of every candidate mappedThe manifestosWhat is a manifesto?The conservative election manifesto - in briefThe Lib Dem manifesto - in briefThe Labour manifesto - in briefThe leadersWho is Rishi Sunak? The PM battling to stay in power after election gambleWho is Keir Starmer? The toolmaker's son promising change for the UKWho is Ed Davey? Lib Dem leader attracting attention with election stuntsWho is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekick "
Yahoo News UK,"3 electoral maps that show how disastrous the election could be for the ToriesWith new modelling predicting a Labour victory even bigger than Tony Blair's 1997 landslide, the outlook for Rishi Sunak is not looking good.",['Which Tory ministers are at risk of losing their seats?'],James Cheng-Morris and  James Hockaday,Updated 5 June 2024 at 8:34 pm·4-min read,5,June,2024,08:34:00,4,"The outlook was already looking bleak for the Conservative Party when Rishi Sunak called the general election following months of dismal approval ratings that showed little sign of improving.At a campaign event last week, Sunak said he didn't think defeat to Labour was a ""foregone conclusion"", suggesting his main election rival Sir Keir Starmer was taking the British electorate ""for granted"".However, a general election projection released on Monday will have added to the Tories' woes – predicting the biggest win for Labour in the party's history, surpassing even that of Tony Blair's 1997 landslide.The analysis, carried out by YouGov for Sky News, used a relatively new polling technique called Multi-level Regression and Post-stratification (MRP), which is regarded to have had a good track record and can provide detailed predictions at a constituency level basis. The scale of Sunak's problems is demonstrated by the interactive maps below, showing just how much ground the Tories are expected to lose compared to their 2019 victory.Click on the arrows in the top left to switch between the two maps. Check your own constituency to see if it is projected to change handsThe first map above shows the seats won in the 2019 general election, when Boris Johnson led the party to a stunning majority.The wall of Tory blue on the map, compared to the spots of Labour red, is a demonstration of just how far Labour, then led by Jeremy Corbyn, had fallen in public standing. The result was Labour's worst electoral performance since 1935.If you toggle to the second map, the projection by YouGov (which was based on polling carried out between 24 May - 1 June) suggests that Starmer's party is on track to win 422 seats, with the Tories down to just 140.Such a result would be the Conservative Party's worst performance at a general election since 1906. If YouGov's predictions are accurate, Labour winning a 194-seat majority would be the highest number since Conservative Stanley Baldwin won a majority of 208 in 1924.The model suggests the Conservatives could be set for near wipeout across many areas of the country, including London, the North East, the North West, and Wales.It also projects that the Scottish National Party would lose more than half their seats, with Labour returning as the largest party north of the border, and the Liberal Democrats reclaiming its place as the third party of British politics – winning 48 seats.The new figures, released yesterday, came as Reform UK co-founder Nigel Farage announced that he would be returning as the populist party's leader and would stand for election in Clacton-on-Sea, Essex. Even before Farage's latest bid, pollsters told Yahoo News that Reform UK could pose a serious threat to the Tories by splitting the vote and potentially handing even more seats to Labour.The YouGov projection follows a similar poll by modelling site Electoral Calculus, which came out on 31 May. The polling also compares the 2019 result with Electoral Calculus' projection.It predicts that Labour is on course to win an even bigger majority of 319 seats - with Starmer's party picking up 485 MPs and the Tories way behind with 66. The modelling shows the Lib Dems getting very close to the Conservative Party, with 59 seats.While Electoral Calculus' polling, based on opinion polls from 8 May to 20 May, returns a different set of projections to YouGov's, both clearly indicate the scale of the problem facing Sunak.The Electoral Calculus model has predicted Sir Keir Starmer's Labour will win a massive majority. (Getty Images)Which Tory ministers are at risk of losing their seats?According to YouGov's polls this week, 12 out of 26 cabinet members running for re-election could lose their seats on 4 July.""These are some of the biggest names in our politics,"" deputy political editor Sam Coates said as he presented the findings on Sky News. ""Every single one of these, right now, is projected on course to lose at the general election.""Those ministers are:Jeremy Hunt, chancellor: Predicted to lose Godalming and Ash seat to the Liberal Democrats by 15 pointsGrant Shapps, defence secretary: Predicted to lose Welwyn Hatfield to Labour by 18 pointsPenny Mordaunt, Commons leader: Predicted to lose Portsmouth North to Labour by five pointsMark Harper, transport secretary: Predicted to lose Forest of Dean to Labour by four pointsAlex Chalk, justice secretary: Predicted to lose Cheltenham by 31 points to the Liberal Democrats by 31 pointsMel Stride, work and pensions secretary: Predicted to lose Central Devon to Labour by one pointJonny Mercer, defence minister: Predicted to lose Plymouth Moor View to Labour by 11 pointsEsther McVey, minister without portfolio: Predicted to lose Tatton to Labour by one pointGillian Keegan, education secretary: Predicted to lose Chichester to the Lib Dems by five pointsSimon Hart, chief whip: Predicted to lose Caerfyrddin to Labour by nine pointsDavid T C Davies, Welsh secretary: Predicted to lose Monmouthshire to Labour by 11 pointsVictoria Prentis, attorney general: Predicted to lose Banbury to Labour by six pointsKeir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
The Guardian,French parliamentary elections – what to look out for and when,"['Turnout', 'National vote share', 'Results', 'Second-round runoffs']",Angelique Chrisafis in Paris,30 June 2024 at 11:19 pm·3-min read,30,June,2024,11:19:00,3,"Voting in the first round of parliamentary elections is under way in mainland France. The last polling stations close at 8pm local time on Sunday.Elections for the 577 seats in France’s national assembly are a two-round process. The shape of the new parliament will become clear only after the second round on 7 July.TurnoutThe turnout at 5pm CET in mainland France was 59.39% according to the interior ministry – a significant increase on the 39.42% who had voted at the same time in the last parliamentary elections in 2022. Polling has suggested that this parliamentary election may have the highest turnout in almost 30 years. The polling firm Elabe estimated that the final turnout would reach 69.5%.Related: France heading to the polls in high-stakes snap parliamentary electionNational vote shareEstimations at 8pm CET will project the national vote share of parties. But this figure must be taken with caution. It will show the broad dynamic of support for each party across France, but it does not indicate the shape of a future parliament because the 577 different constituency votes will be defined by local context and candidates.Polls have shown that, in terms of overall national vote share, the far-right National Rally could substantially increase its showing from the last parliament election, when it took just over 18%, to about 35%. The left alliance has been predicted to follow on about 27% and Emmanuel Macron’s centrists behind on about 21%.ResultsConstituency results will trickle in throughout Sunday evening. A small number of candidates may be elected in the first round. This will depend on voter turnout. To win a seat in the first round, a candidate must score more than 50% of the votes cast, but they must also reach 25% of the total number of registered voters in that constituency. A high turnout makes it easier to reach that threshold of 25%.The far-right leader Marine Le Pen is hoping to be elected in her northern constituency in the first-round and hopes several of her outgoing MPs will do the same. The left is hoping to see some MPs elected on Sunday night, particularly in Paris and its eastern and northern outskirts.Second-round runoffsMost constituencies will go to a second round runoff on 7 July. The two top candidates will go through to the runoff, as well as any candidate who scores more than 12.5% of the total number of registered voters in that constituency. A high turnout would make that 12.5% threshold easier to reach.There could be a significant number of constituencies facing a runoff between three or more candidates on 7 July. This could result in bartering on the left, traditional right and centre over whether one of the candidates should stand down in order not to split the vote against the far right. The bartering and tactical strategy among some parties will begin on Sunday night.The final list of candidates who will stand in the second round runoff will be known on Tuesday evening."
Yahoo News UK,"Who is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekickThe candidate for Hartlepool has seen his party's popularity swell in recent months, with one poll showing reform ahead of the Conservatives.",[],Andrew Naughtie,Updated 14 June 2024 at 6:45 pm·6-min read,14,June,2024,06:45:00,6,"Now that Nigel Farage has taken over as the leader of Reform UK, Richard Tice’s public profile is fading fast - but the Reform chairman remains involved in the party's operations.So far, the party has only one MP, Conservative defector Lee Anderson. But a recent poll has shown Reform overtaking the Tories, raising the possibility Anderson could hold his seat and even end up with fellow Reformers in the next Parliament.As the candidate for Hartlepool, where he stood as the Brexit Party candidate in 2019, Tice hopes to be one of them. So who is he, and what does he stand for?Childhood and educationBorn in Surrey in 1964 to James Tice, a showjumper, and Joan Tice, a horse trainer. Educated at the private boarding school Uppingham, he studied at the University of Salford, gaining a degree in construction economics and quantity surveying – teeing him up for a career that he said would ""continue the family genes in the property industry"".Family (partner & kids)Tice has three children from a 24-year marriage that ended in divorce. He is now in a long-term relationship with the right-wing writer and journalist Isabel Oakeshott.She is perhaps best known for two notorious incidents that set her against leading Tories: a book that featured the heavily disputed allegation that David Cameron had engaged in sexual activity with a pig, and the release of embarrassing messages entrusted to her by Matt Hancock when she agreed to write a book with him.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't sayNet worthWhile not quite in the same league as Rishi Sunak, Tice is one of the wealthiest people in British politics. As he describes it on his website, he made his multi-million-pound fortune over the course of “30 years of making things happen in property investment”, starting with a graduate job at a London firm in 1987.According to Tice, the company he leads as CEO, Quidnet Capital, has “bought and managed £500 million in commercial properties across the UK on behalf of clients”.He was also a key figure in the redevelopment of London’s Nine Elms district, near Battersea Power Station, a controversial project that has transformed a stretch of the Thames’s south bank with a welter of rapidly erected high-rise blocks.GB News linksAlong with Nigel Farage, Lee Anderson and several MPs on the right flank of the Tory party, Tice is a regular on the hard-right, culture war-focused TV outlet GB News. There he hosts a programme called “Richard Tice’s Sunday Sermon”, which serves as a platform for him to deliver his political analysis without the interruptions of an interviewer.However, despite the network being a relatively safe space for him in ideological terms, Tice’s appearances aren’t always amicable. A recent interview with host Andrew Pierce, a longtime right-wing commentator, saw him challenged fiercely about Reform’s chances in a summer election should one be called – with Pierce pointing to the “weirdos” selected by the party to fight numerous seats as evidence the party is “not ready”.Richard Tice, pictured in 2018 at a 'Leave Means Leave' campaign event, is focused on the issue of immigration. (Steve Finn/WENN)Tice was also involved in an incident that saw the network deemed in breach of broadcasting regulator Ofcom’s impartiality regulations, specifically an interview in which a former Brexit Party MEP failed to “sufficiently challenge” his views on immigration.The regulator is under increasing pressure to crack down on GB News heading into the election, with critics arguing it cannot be allowed to broadcast shows that feature Tory and Reform MPs interviewing each other without alternative points of view represented.Tice on NHSThe state and future of the NHS set to be one of this election’s main battlegrounds, and Reform’s key health policy is to spend £17 billion on the NHS on top of its current budget in an effort to get waiting lists down to zero. It also proposes introducing tax relief on private healthcare – something that has been criticised by opponents as a creeping step towards the privatisation of healthcare writ large.Tice’s stated rationale is that the reason the service is struggling is because the money it needs is being spent on other things that the public do not in fact support. Top of the list is Net Zero, which the party and its predecessors have long decried as a pointless “woke” project.In April, Tice used a press conference to frame the choice starkly. “We have a choice in this country, it seems to me,” he said. “A pretty clear choice. Do we want zero waiting lists in two years, and to keep them there? That is the Reform choice. Or do we want net zero CO2 emissions in 25 years? That is the Labour choice.”Tice on immigrationImmigration is by far Reform UK’s top issue, with the party looking to build on Farage’s two decades of campaigning against it in its legal and illegal forms.As far as the election goes, Tice and the party are targeting the continuing arrival of small boats of people travelling across the English Channel, many of them seeking asylum. He has criticised the government for failing to stop “mass immigration” post-Brexit, and described Rishi Sunak’s Rwanda policy as “a disaster”, arguing on GB News that its supposed deterrent value was revealed to be zero just hours after the House of Commons finally passed the law.Reform chairman Richard Tice (L) and leader Nigel Farage speak at the party's economic policy launch at Church House in London. (Alamy Live News)“Within a matter of hours more boats, absolutely packed full, overfilled with illegal migrants, were setting off from the beaches. And we learnt on Tuesday morning that sadly five people, including a young child, drowned leaving the beaches. That's not a deterrent. That's an absolute disaster.”Instead of deporting people to Rwanda, he is arguing for a “pick up and take back” policy that would see small boat arrivals deposited back on French soil. As evidence that this is both practical and humane, he has cited similar policies deployed in the US and Australia.However, he has not addressed the fact that Australia’s policy has been criticised internationally for leaving so-called “boat people” confined to facilities on the island of Nauru, where there have been incidents of suicide and self-immolation.Tice on cost of living crisisPerhaps unsurprisingly given he is trying to peel away former Tory voters, Tice has criticised recent Tory prime ministers harshly for overseeing Britain’s intense cost of living crisis. In 2022, he accused then-prime minister Boris Johnson of “waffling” over the situation. “Clueless, out of touch, no ideas, no help,” he tweeted. “Shocking.”He has also warned that the prospect of a “disastrous” Labour government will offer no prospect of meaningful relief for struggling households.Instead, Reform proposes lifting the minimum level of income tax to £20,000 while cutting various other taxes – among them fuel duty, another gesture to the party’s rejection of environmentalism as a top priority."
The Telegraph,The choice in this general election couldn’t be clearer,[],Telegraph View,1 July 2024 at 5:00 am·2-min read,1,July,2024,05:00:00,2,"Six long weeks of election campaigning are coming to an end, with the polls showing hardly any change in Labour’s lead from when the contest was called on May 22. Sir Keir Starmer is still on course to become prime minister on Friday with one of the biggest parliamentary majorities in history.But while his party remains 20 points ahead of the Tories, this gap flatters to deceive. The polls have also shown a steady fall in support for Labour, from around 44 per cent of the vote share to as low as 38 per cent. Labour has maintained its distance from its opponents because Reform UK has been siphoning support from the Conservatives. If some of those voters return to the fold on Thursday, Sir Keir is still likely to win but by less of a margin than predicted.If there were to be a uniform swing from Tory to Labour, then 38 per cent of the vote would not be enough to secure a Labour victory. It would be the largest party but would need deals with others.But the presence of Reform and tactical voting in Tory-held seats could hand dozens of constituencies to Labour and the Lib Dems, much as in 1997 when the Tories were reduced to around 160 MPs. Some in the party now think that would be a good result on Thursday and confound predictions of a total wipeout.Undecided voters need to consider the consequences not only of giving a party with no popular mandate such a large majority, but of wrecking the one party that will provide any opposition. The Lib Dems or Scottish Nationalists (who face their own reckoning) will back most of what Labour is planning. It really will be a one-party state.Some on the Right want to punish the Tories for failing over 14 years to challenge the social democratic consensus. They hope then to see the party rebuild in opposition. Yet by voting Reform, or not at all, they risk seeing all the things they criticise the Tories over – from climate change policies to immigration and tax rises – worsen under Labour.On the BBC yesterday, Rishi Sunak remained combative and hopeful, as indeed he must. He said that he was proud of his campaign, despite the troubles it has faced.It has alerted the electorate to the dangers of Labour and the stark choice the country faces. If voters are not persuaded yet, they will find out soon enough."
Yahoo News UK,"Who will win the next general election? Latest polls and oddsFive new polls have been published, all of which show Labour holding a large lead over the Conservatives.","['No major changes show Labour on course for large victory', 'Tories could slump to lowest number of seats', 'What are the latest odds?', 'What went wrong for the Tories?']",James Cheng-Morris and  James Hockaday,Updated 27 June 2024 at 11:27 pm·6-min read,27,June,2024,11:27:00,6,"With little over a week to go until the general election, five separate opinion polls continue to show a large Labour lead over the Conservatives.Prime minister Rishi Sunak will have been hoping to make a dent in Labour’s position but the campaign has been far from perfect for the Tories. It is now looking ever-more likely that Sir Keir Starmer will be prime minister by next Friday.Nigel Farage may yet have a good election night as Reform UK are currently in third place in the polls. The polling for the party has slipped following the controversy over Farage’s comments about the war in Ukraine but the party is still some five percentage points ahead of the Lib Dems.There was even further grim reading for the Tories on 26 June, when a separate poll conducted by Ipsos for the Evening Standard claimed that a record seven out of 10 Britons do not like the Conservative Party.Yahoo News UK summaries the positions of the parties according to five separate opinion polls.No major changes show Labour on course for large victoryA poll by Savanta puts Labour on 42% – 21 points ahead of the Tories, who are on 21%. Ipsos also puts Labour on 42%, compared to 19% for the Tories, while JL Partners give similar results, with Labour on 41% and the Tories on 25%.A Verian poll shows Labour on 38%, with the Tories on 21%, while Survation show Labour on 41%, compared to a historic low of 18% for the Tories.An average of opinion polls from February to June this year. (PA)An average of all polls with survey work completed during the seven days to 26 June puts Labour on 41%, 21 points ahead of the Conservatives on 20%, followed by Reform on 16%, the Lib Dems on 11% and the Greens on 6% – unchanged on the figures for the previous week.On 22 May, the day Sunak called the election, the seven-day averages stood at Labour 45%, Conservatives 23%, Reform 11%, Lib Dems 9% and Greens 6%.Tories could slump to lowest number of seatsEarlier this month, three major polls showed the Tories were on course for a historic defeat, with one projection showing the party potentially slumping to the lowest number of seats since the party was formed.Using the multilevel regression with poststratification (MRP) technique, which enables projections to be made at constituency level, YouGov's polling for Sky News projected Labour being on course to achieve a 200-seat majority. The poll suggested Labour would secure 425 seats, the Tories 108, the Liberal Democrats 67, SNP 20, Reform UK five, Plaid Cymru four and the Green Party two.The YouGov poll for Sky News.A More In Common UK poll for the News Agents podcast showed Labour projecting to finish on 406 seats, with the Conservatives on 155.Meanwhile, polling by Savanta and Electoral Calculus for the Telegraph, showed Sunak could become the first sitting prime minister to lose his seat of Richmond and Northallerton to Labour. It put Labour on 516 seats, with the Tories on just 53.What are the latest odds?As of 26 June, Oddschecker – a website which compares odds across different bookmakers – had Labour at 1/41 to win the most seats. To put that in context, this is seen as so likely that a £10 bet would return just £10.24.The Conservatives are 80/1 to win the most seats, a scenario seen as so unlikely that a £10 punt would return £810.A Conservative majority government is also seen as so unlikely (125/1) that Oddschecker sees a Reform UK government as more likely (100/1).What went wrong for the Tories?YouGov's voting intention tracker between January 2020 and June 2024. (YouGov)So, why have the polls changed so dramatically? It's worth looking back on an extremely eventful four-and-a-half years in UK politics.According to YouGov's voting intention tracker (see chart, above), Tory support peaked at 53%, with Labour on 32%, in April 2020, months after the party's stunning success in the 2019 general election and Boris Johnson's pledge to “get Brexit done”. That month also saw Starmer take over as Labour leader from Jeremy Corbyn.This was also amid a spirit of national unity following the onset of the COVID pandemic which nearly killed Johnson himself. The then-PM had been released from hospital five days before this particular survey was taken.Boris Johnson delivers his final speech as prime minister outside 10 Downing Street in September 2022. (AFP via Getty Images)Over the rest of the year, there was a downturn in support amid chaos over COVID rules, with the Tories falling as low as 35% in November 2020, compared to Labour on 40%.However, the UK’s successful COVID vaccination programme provided a pathway out of lockdown and with it, improved poll ratings. Tory support peaked at 41% in June 2021, with Labour at 30%.In October that year, there was a sense Johnson was untouchable. At the Tory party conference, the BBC's Laura Kuenssberg remarked how the PM was ""in total command of his party, and politically dominant in the country"".But this fell apart quickly with the Partygate scandal, which emerged in November that year. Time and again, reports emerged of government and Tory staff – including Johnson – having taken part in lockdown-era social gatherings when their own COVID rules had prohibited them.By January 2022, Tory support had plummeted to 28%, with Labour on 38%. Johnson struggled on, but never recovered and a wave of ministerial resignations forced him to resign in July that year.The UK had three separate prime ministers – Boris Johnson, Liz Truss and Rishi Sunak – between 6 September and 24 October, 2022. (Getty Images)His successor, Liz Truss, then embarked on arguably the most disastrous prime ministerial reign in history, characterised by the catastrophic ""mini-budget"", containing £45bn of unfunded tax cuts, which prompted an economic crisis. Like Johnson, she lost the confidence of Tory MPs – and voters – and had to resign.Her 49-day spell as PM was the shortest in history, with Tory support plummeting to 19% (with Labour on 56%) the day after she announced her resignation in October 2022.Rishi Sunak, who had lost to Truss in the previous month's Tory leadership election, took over. However, as the above YouGov chart indicates, he has failed to cut through with voters. Tory support was at 23% two days after he assumed office, with the most recent survey, carried out on Thursday, showing support is now lower than under Truss at 18%.In short, the polls and odds, not to mention other factors such as notable by-election victories for Starmer's Labour, are pointing to a Labour government next week.Your guide to votingHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhat voter ID can I bring to the election?Who is standing in my constituency? Full list of every candidate mappedThe manifestosWhat is a manifesto?The Conservative election manifesto - in briefThe Lib Dem manifesto - in briefThe Labour manifesto - in briefThe leadersWho is Rishi Sunak? The PM battling to stay in power after election gambleWho is Keir Starmer? The toolmaker's son promising change for the UKWho is Ed Davey? Lib Dem leader attracting attention with election stuntsWho is Richard Tice? Reform’s former leader turned Farage sidekick "
The Telegraph,Marine Le Pen’s surge is a warning to Sir Keir Starmer,[],Kamal Ahmed,1 July 2024 at 2:48 am·6-min read,1,July,2024,02:48:00,6,"In the upper-echelons of the Labour Party, as they consider a UK run by them (and such is their confidence, the urinal-equipped chancellor’s loo is being reassessed ready for the first female occupant of the role), a name is whispered with a worried nod of the head and a concerned furrowing of the brow.The rise and calamitous fall of Emmanuel Macron has become the scary bedtime story for Sir Keir Starmer’s closest team – the type of tale a concerned parent might tell their children to stop them scrumping apples. “Don’t do that, or you will suffer the same fate as Monsieur Le President!”A centrist, pro-European leader, Macron won the 2017 French presidential election on a wave of “change” rhetoric. For a period, he could do no wrong, as hyper-low interest rates and strong growth cemented the idea that En Marche! (the new party he founded) was going to solve the age-old problems of establishment, out-of-touch politics and, even worse, corrupt, idiot politicians. He was welcomed as a breath of fresh air, an antidote to the chaos of busted governments that had run out of ideas.Then came Covid, the Ukraine-related energy shock, and controversial attempts at public sector and policy reform, particularly to the pension age. Being pro-EU (with the sticky insistence on remote rule-making from Brussels) suddenly became a hindrance, not a help. After rising so high, Macron has fallen to the humbling low of having to call an early election on the core question of what kind of France voters want. When Edward Heath tried a similar “Who governs?” strategy in 1974, it did not end well for the Conservatives.Macron has been assaulted from the Right and the Left for failing to seal the deal he put before the French electorate. He is the Sun King turned to Mr Bean, to paraphrase Sir Vince Cable’s deadly description of that other fallen giant, Gordon Brown.But whereas Brown came up against a rather gentlemanly One Nation Tory in the form of Lord Cameron, Macron’s challenge is dressed very differently. Tweeds have been replaced by stilettos. The man “who was the future once” has been humiliated not only by a coalition of the Left but also at the hands of a hard-Right, charismatic leader who sniffed an opportunity (immigration) and turned it into a political attack super-virus. Marine Le Pen is not just a threat to Le President. She is a threat to the established order.Just as Nigel Farage would like to be here. Both gladly dabble with the dark forces of “culture” and “patriotism” to gather support.What does France and more specifically Macron have to do with Sir Keir Starmer? Lots, as it happens. Macron won two thirds of the votes in 2017, 30 per cent more than Le Pen’s Front National. It was a clear victory which appeared to prove that France wanted him, and not the alternative. But rather than deal with the alternative, Macron has now been surrounded by it. An economy in a funk, immigration continuing to worry enough voters to matter, and a leader who confused winning big with political righteousness.And that has become Labour’s bedtime story. On Thursday, Starmer is set to land what appears to be a game-changing majority. But he will do so without convincing the voters that Labour is actually the answer. For a period, benign economic tailwinds (next week energy prices will fall by 7 per cent, by the end of the year 1.5 million homeowners are likely to see their mortgage repayments drop, real incomes will continue to rise) will hide a myriad of rocks under the surface.Will Labour’s policy of return agreements really stop the boats? Will Wes Streeting, all set to be the next health secretary, put in place the right policies to start turning around the NHS and social care? Will the unions wear it? Will voters remain silent in the face of the pro-building revolution Labour has promised?And if growth stutters, the public finances will turn against Rachel Reeves and the bond markets will start charging the UK more to fund the increased borrowing that will be necessary to hide the holes. Taxes will rise and Starmer’s support – wide but always shallow – may disappear.And Farage, the new MP for Clacton, will be waiting.Labour is a tribe that tends towards panic. You don’t lose as many elections as the party has managed in its 124-year history without sensing disaster around every corner – because it so often is. Where the Right are mostly furious when voters turn against them and shout that it is everyone else’s fault, the Left disappear into months, sometimes years, of introspection and “why are we so useless?” narratives.In government, the same emotions prevail. It can lead to caution, paralysis and poor policy-making. Particularly if you have, like Starmer and Brown, a rather dogmatic tendency to believe that pulling the levers of the state can solve problems. Starmer, unlike Brown, also sees the EU as a route to greater prosperity, a policy push laughingly dismissed by one seasoned EU negotiator I know as “delusional, they are never going to give us anything of any real economic value, we’ve left”.And Farage will sniff his opportunity.“On July 5, we are going to have to think immediately about Reform,” one senior Labour figure told me. “If we leave it, think the threat will go away, then we will only have to look across the Channel for what could happen.”Starmer makes a lot of the fact that he only recently came into politics. But what he thinks is a strength is actually a weakness. Margaret Thatcher and Tony Blair were political to their fingertips, able to marshal arguments that convinced electorates for nearly all of their political careers.Blair, whom Starmer admires, had the political instincts to rise above controversies, even when, as in the case of his enthusiasm for open borders with the EU and the Iraq war, he created them. People often forget that he won his third election in a row after the controversy over non-existent weapons of mass destruction.Starmer lacks the political nous to see traps before they form. He does not suffer hubris, at least. And in Reeves he will have an able chancellor who is likely to help him out of a number of bear pits. Streeting is another strong performer who wants to reform the health service and not just give it more money.Starmer will need to discover a new gear once in No 10 – market orientated, non-ideological, willing to listen. Drift to his instinctive Left and he will allow space for Farage to pounce, particularly if whatever is left of a bloodied and bowed Conservative Party tries to do a deal with the private-school educated banker from leafy, suburban London who likes to pretend he is in some way a “man of the people”.If Starmer does not learn that being prime minister is different from leading (and liking) a cosy club of liberal progressives, then the seeds of his destruction will soon become apparent. Just as they have for the President of the Fifth Republic."
PA Media: UK News,Swinney says he would discuss Labour’s proposed immigration scheme for Scotland,[],"Ryan McDougall, PA",30 June 2024 at 11:33 pm·3-min read,30,June,2024,11:33:00,3,"The First Minister says he would discuss a new immigration scheme for Scotland proposed by Labour.Speaking in Irvine on Sunday as part of the SNP’s campaign ahead of the upcoming election, John Swinney said at a UK-level, the Labour Party’s current approach towards immigration is “fiercely hostile”, and called for “urgent clarity” from the party to set out its immigration plans for Scotland.In its manifesto, the Labour Party says it will ensure that “migration to address skills shortages triggers a plan to upskill workers and improve working conditions in the UK”.It added: “Given skills policy and employment support are devolved, we will work with the Scottish government when designing workforce plans for different sectors.“This will ensure our migration and skills policies work for every part of the UK. We will end the long-term reliance on overseas workers in some parts of the economy.“The days of a sector languishing endlessly on the shortage occupation lists with no action to train up workers will come to an end.”Mr Swinney said: “There are some newspaper reports that the Labour Party is proposing some sort of immigration scheme for Scotland.“I would welcome such discussions – I think we need urgent clarity from the Labour Party if that actually is their position because at a UK level, the UK leadership of the Labour Party is fiercely hostile to immigration and are following the agenda of the Conservatives.“So I want to make sure that we’ve got substantial opportunities for discussion and my government will certainly engage in a constructive way on these questions.”Earlier on Sunday, Mr Swinney told BBC’s The Sunday Show he would work with Labour if it wins, and encourage more people of working age to move to Scotland for their career prospects.Asked to elaborate, Mr Swinney said: “The key thing we’ve lost is access to freedom of movement in the European Union.“That has been a disaster for Scotland – it’s one of the many attributes of Brexit that has been damaging to the Scottish economy and that issue is really not being covered in the election campaign.“The Labour Party and the Conservatives are running a mile from the economic and social impacts of Brexit.“It’s been damaging in terms of population loss, it’s been damaging in terms of economic opportunities, so the sooner we can get back into the EU, which we can through independence, we should take that opportunity.”Asked if he is happy with the response he and his party received while in Irvine, Mr Swinney said: “There’s a strong reaction, a positive reaction to our campaign.“People realise that austerity, which was started by the Conservatives, delivered for 14 years, is now going to be carried along by the Labour Party and that’s absolutely crystal clear from all the evidence that’s been set out.“So we’ve got to have a strong group of SNP MPs that will reel against austerity in the House of Commons and do all that they can to protect the Scottish interest and to make sure that we have the opportunity to design a future for Scotland, in Scotland, which will ensure that the priorities and the needs of the people of Scotland are effectively addressed”."
Sky News,Nigel Farage rules out joining Conservatives and says he wants nothing to do with them,[],Sky News,Updated 1 July 2024 at 1:25 am·3-min read,1,July,2024,01:25:00,3,"Nigel Farage has ruled out joining the Tory party saying he wants ""nothing to do with them"".Some Conservatives want the Reform UK leader to join their ranks to combat his rising popularity in the polls.Election latest: Reform candidate disowns party amid racism row - and backs ToriesMr Farage has previously told Sky News this was ""not on my agenda"" but did not categorically reject the idea when pressed repeatedly.Speaking today to Sky News' political editor Beth Rigby, he said the party he currently leads is ""a new political movement"" and ""I want nothing to do with them [the Conservatives]"".Asked if that means he is ruling out joining, he said: ""If you don't work out that's a yes, I don't know what else I've got to say.""Mr Farage has weaponised the Tory implosion and his primary argument at this election is that the Conservative Party is spent and needs replacing.He wants his party to become the official opposition to an expected Labour government and ruled out any sort of electoral pact with the Tories, having agreed to one in 2019 to help Boris Johnson win seats.Back then Reform UK was known as the Brexit Party - but Mr Farage says the Tories' failure to cut immigration since leaving the EU has betrayed voters.""They have no interest in the truth. For them, it's all a game,"" he told Beth Rigby.""They're awful, they are ghastly,"" he added.Mr Farage's language goes further than an interview two weeks ago when he was also asked about joining the Tories.He is making his eighth bid to become an MP, this time in Clacton in Essex, and while some polls project him to win, the UK's first past-the-post voting system makes it difficult for Reform to make huge strides in a couple of elections.Earlier this month Sky News' deputy political editor Sam Coates asked him if the Tory party would be a better vehicle for his ambitions post-election and if he would rule out joining.Mr Farage said he could not see it happening and called the question ""moronic"".Pressed if that was a categorical rejection, he said he had ""no intention"" of joining the Tories but did not rule it out.Read More: Farage sidesteps question about Tory switchSome Tories want Mr Farage to join the fold to combat the threat of Reform UK, which is to the right of the Conservative Party.Reform's popularity in the polls surged after Mr Farage announced he would be taking over as leader and putting himself forward as a candidate in the election.Former Home Secretary Suella Braverman and former immigration minister Robert Jenrick are in favour of him joining but the issue is divisive - with senior figures like Priti Patel, Kemi Badenoch and James Cleverly being against it.After enjoying a relatively smooth start to his election campaign, Mr Farage has this week been embroiled in a race row after one of his campaigners was caught on camera using a racial slur to describe the prime minister - and one candidate has now defected to the Tories. He has also faced a backlash for saying the West and NATO provoked Russia's war in Ukraine The other candidates standing in Clacton against Nigel Farage for Reform UK are:• Matthew Bensilum, Liberal Democrats• Craig Jamieson, Climate Party• Tony Mack, Independent• Natasha Osben, Green Party• Jovan Owusu-Nepaul, Labour Party• Tasos Papanastasiou, Heritage Party• Andrew Pemberton, UKIP• Giles Watling, Conservative Party"
The Guardian,More than £320m spent on Rwanda policy will be lost if Tories lose election,[],Diane Taylor,1 July 2024 at 0:33 am·3-min read,1,July,2024,00:33:00,3,"More than £320m spent by the government on the controversial scheme to send asylum seekers to Rwanda is likely to be lost if the Conservatives are voted out of power at Thursday’s general election.The sum has been spent on economic development money for Rwanda, along with set-up costs for the scheme, which cannot be recovered if it does not go ahead.Labour has described the scheme as a gimmick that will go down in history as “one of the most absurd and wasteful Home Office policies of all time”.The party has committed to ditching the scheme if elected, instead focusing resources on a new Border Security Command to smash the people-smuggling gangs helping asylum seekers to cross the Channel in small boats.Related: Home secretary’s aide says Rwanda policy is ‘crap’, in leaked recordingThe Home Office has said that if the Conservatives are re-elected the first flight may take off for Rwanda on 24 July.A National Audit Office report published in February of this year found that £270m would be handed over to Rwanda by the end of the 2023/24 financial year in April for the country’s Economic Transformation and Integration Fund (ETIF). It is non-refundable.Other monies spent that cannot be refunded include £2.3m on legal fees for the Home Office to respond to legal challenges against Rwanda, Home Office direct staffing costs for the scheme, which stood at £2m in February 2024, £413,541 on three home secretaries travelling to Rwanda at various points since the deal was announced in April 2022 and an estimated £500,000 in the cost of arresting and detaining more than 100 asylum seekers who were intended to be sent to Rwanda.All of those asylum seekers are now thought to have been released back into the community and some of them are seeking damages for unlawful detention. There is also the cost of bail hearings for this group.In addition, there are miscellaneous costs such as training Rwandan officials and resettling vulnerable refugees from Rwanda here.The Home Office has always acknowledged that the Rwanda deal is a “high risk and novel policy” and agreed to monitor the ETIF funding because, according to the NAO report: “The Home Office has recognised the need to manage the risk of fraud, bribery and corruption.” It is unclear what will happen to this monitoring of the non-refundable hundreds of millions if the Conservatives do not win the election.Stephen Kinnock, Labour’s shadow minister for Immigration, said: “Rishi Sunak’s Rwanda gimmick will go down in history as one of the most absurd and wasteful Home Office policies of all time. It is an insult to the British taxpayer, and the tiny numbers of people involved will not create a deterrent for those crossing the Channel. “Labour will cancel the Rwanda gimmick and redirect the money into a new Border Security Command, with hundreds of new specialist officers using new powers to smash the criminal gangs that are smuggling people across the Channel.”Sonya Sceats, chief executive at Freedom from Torture, said: “The sums of money spent on this disastrous “cash for humans” scheme are eye watering but wholly beside the point when we remember the people at the centre of this scandal.“Every day in our therapy rooms we care for men and women who have suffered torture only to face existential dread here in the UK at the prospect of being bundled on to planes to Rwanda, a notorious torturing state.”The Conservatives have been approached for comment."
Yahoo News UK,"Who is Rishi Sunak? PM battles to stay in power after election gambleAs the prime minister calls a snap election, here’s everything you need to know about Rishi Sunak and what he’s saying about the biggest issues in British politics","['Early life', ""Sunak's family"", 'His parents', 'His education', 'How much is he worth?', 'His religion', 'Sunak on... the NHS', 'Sunak on… immigration', 'Sunak on... the cost of living crisis', 'Sunak on... pensions']",Hannah Fearn,23 May 2024 at 7:21 pm·8-min read,23,May,2024,07:21:00,8,"Rishi Sunak has the fight of his political life ahead of him after calling a snap general election for 4 July. The polls have consistently painted a very bleak picture for the prime minister, with Labour holding on to a double-digit poll lead over his Conservatives.Recent by-election results suggest that Labour is likely to win a landslide victory – but there’s still time for the PM to turn it around.Here’s everything you need to know about Sunak and what’s he’s saying about the biggest issues in British politics right now.Early lifeSunak was born in Southampton in 1980, the eldest of three children. His Indian parents both arrived from East Africa in the 1960s. A football-mad boy whose childhood idol was Matt Le Tissier, Sunak was described by the family’s neighbours as a child with “lovely manners”.In his youngest years, the PM attended Oakmount, a local private prep school, and later Stroud School in Romsey. According to a recent biography, fellow pupil Ollie Case said: “He was someone that was talked about. The teachers would say: ‘He’s going to be prime minister'.""But, growing up in the 1980s and 90s, he also remembers experiencing racism. “My mother was obsessed with us not having accents,” Sunak has said.Rishi Sunak was football-mad as a boy growing up in Southampton. (ITV)Sunak's familySunak is married to Akshata Murty, the daughter of an Indian entrepreneur and multi-billionaire. The pair first met in 2004 at Stanford University, his future wife apparently attracted to his “honesty and integrity”.Five years later they married in a two-day Indian wedding held in Bangalore. The couple have two daughters, Krishna and Anoushka, who will turn 13 and 11 this year, both of whom are largely kept out of the public eye.Sunak attended Oakmount, a local private prep school, and later Stroud School in Romsey. (Rishi Sunak, Instagram)His parentsYashvir Sunak, Rishi’s father, was born in Kenya. He arrived in the UK to study medicine and then stayed, becoming an NHS GP. His mother, Usha, was born in Tanzania and is a pharmacist.The couple met in Britain and settled in Southampton in the 1970s. Usha is still the director and lead pharmacist at Sunak Pharmacy in Southampton.His educationAs a teenager Sunak studied at Winchester College where he was, he says, a self-confessed “geek”. According to a recent biography, the “naughtiest” thing the prime minister did during his school days “was to smuggle a hand-held television into the school so that he did not miss any key games of Euro 96”.The childhood home of Rishi Sunak in Southampton. (Getty Images, photo taken in 2022)Perhaps unsurprisingly for someone with such an unblemished record, he went on to become the school’s head boy. Sunak worked while studying, delivering medicines for his mother’s pharmacy and as a waiter at a local Indian restaurant.After school, Sunk read philosophy, politics and economics at Lincoln College, Oxford, graduating in 2001 with a first class degree. While still at university he held an internship at the Conservative Party campaign headquarters and joined the party, but went on studying before entering politics.He earned his MBA from Stanford in 2006 as a Fulbright Scholar, meaning he was selected among the most promising candidates from the UK.How much is he worth?As prime minister, Rishi Sunak earns £80,807 on top of a salary of £84,144 for being an MP. But his current income from Westminster pales in comparison to his family’s vast wealth through marriage.The Sunday Times valued the couple’s joint fortune at £730m. Murty's father is the co-founder of Infosys, an Indian tech conglomerate, in which she holds shares estimated at around £430m. Her family is also involved in a £900m business arrangement with Amazon in India, and she is a shareholder of multiple other companies.Rishi Sunak's mother is still the director and lead pharmacist at Sunak Pharmacy in Southampton.Before entering politics Sunak worked for Goldman Sachs and a series of hedge funds. He is also known to have invested in blind trusts, in which investments are made without holders knowing where the funds are located. These arrangements reportedly hold Sunak’s own multi-million-pound fortune.His religionSunak is not only the first prime minister of colour and of Indian heritage but he is also the first practising Hindu to hold the biggest job in UK politics.He has spoken of his pride in his Hindu faith, saying, “that’s how I was raised, and that’s how I am”. He said: “Having faith gives you resilience, gives you strength that is important and it provides an outlook on life which I find particularly valuable.”Sunak on... the NHSThe prime minister’s biggest challenge in office has been the crisis in the NHS - and to many people in the sector his government has been found wanting. “We have not made enough progress,” Sunak said when asked about his commitment to cut NHS waiting lists during an interview with Piers Morgan on TalkTV. Asked if that meant he had failed, the prime minister replied: “Yes, we have.""Sunak expects to see waiting lists start to reduce this spring, and blames the delays on “industrial action”, as disputes with junior doctors and consultants over pay and conditions continue. Yet Sunak himself has been blamed for holding up a deal that would prevent more walkouts.Sunak, his wife Akshata and daughters Anoushka and Krishna (second left) at Santa Monica Pier, California, on their summer holiday in 2023. (AP)Sunak on… immigrationAccording to the prime minister, illegal migration threatens to “overwhelm” Europe. In June 2023 he claimed his plan to “stop the boats” and tackle illegal immigration was working, but by August 2023 he had changed his mind: “It’s not an easy problem to fix,” he told broadcasters. “I never said we would be able to solve it overnight.”He has staked much of his reputation on the government's Rwanda Bill - his plan to deport asylum seekers to the east African country that finally became law last month, after months of legal and procedural challenges. It has paved the way for deportation flights to get off the ground within weeks.He described his policy, which he says will act as a deterrent to people traffickers, as being “the will of the people” – yet polling suggests low support for such a punitive approach.The policy, coupled with Conservative talk of limits on legal migration, shows that the government is committed to taking a hard line on the issue, despite the risk of alienating more moderate voters.The Rwanda policy is not universally popular. (YouGov)Sunak on... the cost of living crisisThe prime minister has told hard-pressed working families that they will feel some relief from the cost of living crisis as inflation continues to drop following its highs of October 2022. He described the government’s tax cuts as “meaningful” and has welcomed the dip in mortgage rates at the turn of the year.Sunak says falling inflation will have the biggest impact on family budgets “and will start to ease some of those pressures” and that he was right to focus on that figure. However, the global drop in energy prices is probably the biggest factor in easing the hit on wallets - something that the prime minister has no control over.However, the fall in inflation to 2.3% on 22 May this year – the lowest it has been in nearly three years – was likely one of the key factors in persuading Sunak to call a snap election many weeks earlier than experts had predicted.Can we expect more handouts or tax breaks to help balance family budgets? Not according to Sunak, who has warned voters that it’s time to “move on” from government support.Sunak on... pensionsThe triple-lock pensions policy is a tricky one for Sunak – especially since Labour has committed to retaining the policy. Any change to a policy that has become a hallmark of recent Conservative governments would not go down well with the 12 million pensioners it would likely impact – many of whom are lifelong Tory voters.Last November, the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) said pensions should start being pegged to an average of inflation and wage growth, which would help reduce state spending over time.Sunak’s response to that was ambiguous to say the least: “We are the government that has … delivered the triple lock and it is why, right now, pensions are, depending on how you look at it, £800 or £900 bigger than they otherwise would have been.” He is yet to confirm whether it will appear in the manifesto."
The Independent,Rishi Sunak says he is proud of disastrous election campaign - and claims he will win,[],Kate Devlin,1 July 2024 at 1:07 am·5-min read,1,July,2024,01:07:00,5,"Rishi Sunak has said he is “proud” of his disastrous election campaign and claims he will win Thursday’s general election.The prime minister has come under fire in recent weeks for a series of calamities that included a rain-soaked announcement of polling day, leaving D-Day commemorations early and a gambling scandal.But in a crunch interview with just days to go before the vote, Mr Sunak told the BBC‘s Sunday with Laura Kuenssberg “this campaign is something I am very proud of” as he sought to disparage Labour’s plans.He also said he believes he will win the election. Asked whether he thought he would still be prime minister on Friday, he said: “Yes. I’m fighting very hard and I think people are waking up to the real danger of what a Labour government means.”Rishi Sunak, soaked in rain, pauses as he delivers a speech to announce the election date (Getty)But as the Tory blame game escalated before even a vote has been counted former cabinet minister John Redwood accused Mr Sunak of helping to deliver a large Labour majority.He hit out at what he called the ‘One Nation leadership’ of his party and said together with Nigel Farage’s Reform, they will “visit on us a Labour government that may have a lower vote share than Labour led by Jeremy Corbyn gained in 2017 but have a large majority of MPs”.In a small crumb of good news for Mr Sunak, however, the Reform candidate in Erewash, Liam Booth-Isherwood defected to back the Conservatives. “Whilst I have campaigned alongside many decent, honest and hardworking people during the course of the General Election campaign in Erewash, the reports of widespread racism and sexism in Reform have made clear that there is a significant moral issue within certain elements of the party,” he said.In a wide-ranging interview, the Leave-campaigning Tory leader also admitted that Brexit has been bad for many British businesses.He was confronted by comments by his small business minister Kevin Hollinrake that there was “no doubt” exporting to the EU had been made more difficult by the UK’s exit.Mr Hollinrake said: “There’s no doubt, for some businesses, it is more difficult to trade with the European Union. There is no doubt that is the case.”He went on to pick out businesses in the food and drink sector, particularly small and medium-sized enterprises.Kevin Hollinrake admits Brexit was bad for many businesses (Good Morning Britain)Asked about those remarks, the prime minister said: “Of course when you leave the single market and the customs union that is going to change our trading relationships.”He added: “But we have the deepest, bilateral free trade agreement with the European continent that any nation has anywhere around the world.”He also claimed the UK is a “better place to live” in now than it was when the Tories took office in 2010, although he pointed to the pandemic and the war in Ukraine as he conceded “the last few years have been difficult for everyone”.But he was then asked to look at a screen on which viewers’ comments were projected. One of them, Sheila, told the PM: “Our biggest worry is not about tax, it’s about having the basics.”An at times tetchy PM also became involved in a spat with the BBC presenter, who at one point told him: “That’s not what I said prime minister.”He also claimed there was a “clear difference” between his handling of the racism row surrounding Tory donor Frank Hester and how Nigel Farage responded to racist comments made about the PM by a Reform UK canvasser.On the programme, he was shown a message from a viewer who expressed concern that Mr Sunak’s stance on racism had not been zero tolerance and who pointed to the Hester row.The donor, from whom the party has continued to accept donations, allegedly said Labour MP Diane Abbott “should be shot” and that she made him “want to hate all black women”.Mr Sunak said: “I think it’s reasonable when someone is genuinely contrite about what’s happened, accepts what they’ve done is wrong, then that apology is accepted.”He added: “The difference here is... Nigel Farage has just described these comments as ‘inappropriate’.“They’re not inappropriate. They were vile and racist and wrong, but he’s only said that they’re inappropriate.“The person who made them has only apologised to the Reform party for the impact it’s had on them. It’s a very clear difference. There’s no contrition or remorse or acceptance of what’s happened in that case.”For his part Mr Farage insisted “the bad apples are gone” from Reform.After claiming the audience on BBC's Question Time on Friday, during which he was questioned about his party's supporters, ""was rigged"", which the BBC denies, he said Reform would campaign to abolish the TV licence fee as ""the leading voice of opposition"" because it had ""abused its position of power”.Earlier, Mr Sunak claimed Sir Keir Starmer could inflict “irreversible damage” on the UK within 100 days of entering Downing Street.The PM said Labour “cannot be trusted” and predicted a plan to impose VAT on private schools would cause “chaos” for families.Meanwhile, Labour said Sir Keir‘s first steps would be restoring economic stability and cutting NHS waiting lists as “the work of change begins”. The Labour Party leader said his party offered voters hope for a better future.After the PM’s interview, Jonathan Ashworth, Labour’s shadow paymaster general, said: “It’s excruciating to watch Rishi Sunak just gloss over the concerns of ordinary working people.“Rishi Sunak has no remorse for his record: prices are up in the shops, NHS waiting lists have rocketed, and mortgages have soared. He just doesn’t understand what the Conservatives have inflicted on voters over the past 14 years.“Britain simply cannot afford five more years of the Tories. Their pie-in-the-sky, unfunded manifesto risks heaping £4,800 more onto family mortgages.”"
The Independent,John Redwood accuses Rishi Sunak of helping to deliver large Labour majority as Tory blame game escalates,[],Kate Devlin and David Maddox,1 July 2024 at 1:01 am·3-min read,1,July,2024,01:01:00,3,"A former Tory cabinet minister has accused Rishi Sunak of helping to ensure a large Labour victory as the Tory blame game escalates before even a single vote has been cast.John Redwood hit out at what he called the ‘One Nation leadership’ of his party.He said that together with Nigel Farage’s Reform, if they polls are correct, they will “visit on us” a Labour government “that may have a lower vote share than Labour led by Jeremy Corbyn... but have a large majority of MPs giving it a lot of potential power.”However, that would only hold if Labour “can keep its party together”, he added.Sir John Redwood (Getty Images)A shock poll last week put Mr Farage’s Reform three points ahead of the Conservatives.Although unlikely to take more than a handful of seats, Tory MPs fear they will split the right wing vote, handing many constituencies to Labour.Opinion polls also suggest Keir Starmer’s party is on course to a handsome victory on Thursday, with some forecasting the party could even have a larger parliamentary majority than Tony Blair in 1997.Some Brexiteers are furious that what they see as a “gulf” on the right of the party that has left Mr Farage and Reform to potentially take millions of voters from the Tories.Right-wingers like Suella Braverman and Jacob Rees-Mogg have already said they agree with many of Reform’s policies.As polling day nears many Conservatives are gearing up to set out what they think went wrong.Nadine Dorries has claimed the election ‘will be a verdict on Michael Gove’ and think tanks (Jeff Overs/BBC/PA) (PA Media)Last week former cabinet minister Nadine Dorries  was first out of the traps, telling The Independent she blames Michael Gove for a malaise that has set in over the last 14 years.“This general election will be a verdict on Michael Gove and his think tanks, Onward and Policy Exchange, more than a verdict on any serving or former prime minister,” she said.She added: “Gove has repeatedly stabbed democratically elected Prime Ministers in the back - Boris in 2016 and 22, and Liz in 22 - and at every turn he’s chosen the socialist rather than the conservative option. This is why we’re behind in the polls.On his blog, Mr Redwood wrote: “Labour is forecast to have a huge majority of MPs. Why?“There is a frustration that the two parties (Labour and Conservative) are so alike. They both backed Covid lockdowns. They both backed printing large sums of money which proved inflationary...They have both presided over large increases in NHS waiting lists, Labour in Wales and Conservatives in England. They both backed the Windsor framework limiting the opportunities of Brexit. Neither proposed a good pruning of EU bureaucracy and regulations. Both allowed large scale migration.”He added: “The result of the combined actions of Reform and the One Nation Conservative leadership if the polls are right will be to visit on us a Labour government that may have a lower vote share than Labour led by Jeremy Corbyn gained in 2017  but have a large majority of MPs giving it a lot of potential power if it can keep its party together.”"
The Guardian,French elections: far right on course for first round victory. What happens now?,"['What are the rules of the two-round system?', 'How does it usually work?', 'What’s different about this election?', 'What generally happens in “triangular” contests?', 'So what will happen this time?']",Jon Henley,1 July 2024 at 3:09 am·5-min read,1,July,2024,03:09:00,5,"The National Rally (RN) has won 34% of the popular vote in the first round of France’s snap two-round general election, according to early estimates, with the leftwing New Popular Front (NFP) alliance on 28%-29% and President Emmanuel Macron’s centrist Together bloc on 20%-22%.A national vote share, however, is extremely difficult to translate into a projected number of seats in the assemblée nationale. That’s because the final outcome will depend on the results in the constituencies. While pollsters issue seat estimates, France’s polling watchdog does not endorse them.Here’s a guide to what comes next as voters gear up for the decisive second round of voting on 7 July, when France could decide to give control of its government to the far-right, anti-immigrant party for the first time in its history.What are the rules of the two-round system?To win one of the 577 seats in the national assembly in the first round, a candidate must get more than 50% of ballots cast, representing at least 25% of registered voters.This usually happens only rarely, although the 2024 election’s high turnout has seen the number rise sharply to perhaps as many as 80.If no candidate in a constituency achieves that, the two highest scorers plus anyone else who collected at least 12.5% of total registered voters advance to a second round. In that round, the candidate who obtains the most votes is elected.How does it usually work?The two-round system is highly disproportionate and artificially boosts larger parties. On a turnout of 65%, for example, the 12.5% hurdle means parties would have to secure the backing of almost 20% of eligible voters to advance to the second round.In recent legislative elections, turnout has been significantly lower than that, meaning that in almost every constituency, only two candidates have gone through to the second round and the number of three- or four-way contests has been very low.In the 2012 elections, with a turnout of 57%, there were 34 so-called “triangular” runoffs. In 2017, when turnout was 49%, there was only one, and last time around in 2022 there were eight on a turnout of just 47%. The previous record was 76, in 1997.What’s different about this election?The combination of the highest turnout since the 1980s and fewer candidates – 4,011 against 6,290 in 2022 – from just three main camps (left, centre and far right) – means the second round of the 2024 ballot will feature a record number of “triangular” contests.With an estimated 69% of registered voters casting a ballot on Sunday, voters in a record number of constituencies could, in principle, face a three-way race on 7 July, according to polling – perhaps as many as half of all seats in the assembly. The pollster Ipsos on Sunday forecast between 285 and 315 three-way contests.In theory, three- or four-way contests should work in favour of the party with the largest share of the vote in the first round – in these elections, generally RN – because the opposition vote is split. Many three-way contests, however, do not stay that way.What generally happens in “triangular” contests?Until recently, if the RN looked like winning a seat in a three-way race, the second- and third-placed parties would negotiate to determine whose candidate would drop out.To be successful, however, that strategy requires both that the mainstream parties are willing to withdraw candidates, and that voters are happy to play along, with centre-left voters backing a candidate from the centre right, and vice versa.But that “Republican front” has been steadily fraying, with voters increasingly unwilling to “hold their noses” and cast their ballots for parties whose policies do not necessarily align with their political preferences. In 2022, RN returned a record 89 deputies.So what will happen this time?As far as the parties go, senior figures in the four-party left-green NFP alliance – including the firebrand leader of the radical left France Unbowed (LFI), Jean-Luc Mélenchon – have promised that in all constituencies where RN is in first place and an NFP candidate is in third, the NFP candidate will withdraw.Macron’s camp has been far less clear about what its candidates would do in a similar position, with the president and party leaders calling both rival camps “extreme” – in the case of NFP, largely because it is dominated by LFI. On Sunday, however, the prime minister, Gabriel Attal, said third placed candidates should step aside: “Not one single vote must go to the National Rally.”As far as voters go, things are even more complicated. An Ipsos poll last week found 87% NFP voters willing to cast their ballot to block RN, but only 62% of Together voters. Another poll, by Odoxa, found that fewer voters (41%) were willing to block RN than to block NFP (47%) or Together (44%).In short, the situation is highly uncertain and will remain fluid until the actual candidates running in the second round become clear. With up to half the seats in the assembly potentially becoming three-way contests, the scope for an anti-RN “Republican front” is clearly there – but the extent of inter-party cooperation will be critical, as will be voters’ willingness to vote tactically."
Yahoo News UK,"Confused by election jargon? The common words and phrases explainedCertain phrases such as the 'triple lock plus' have also become defining issues of the election, with the terms bandied about by politicians on both sides.","['Absentee ballot', 'Ballot box', 'Campaign', 'Canvassing', 'Capital gains tax', 'Child benefit', 'Coalition', 'Constituency', 'ECHR', 'Exit poll', 'First past the post', 'Hung parliament', 'Income tax threshold', 'Majority', 'Manifesto', 'Marginal seat', 'Net zero', 'Opinion poll', 'Poll', 'Postal vote', 'Proxy vote', 'Psephology', 'Polling day', 'Purdah', 'Spoiled ballot', 'Swing', 'Tax burden', 'The Equality Act', 'Triple lock', 'Triple lock plus', 'Turnout', 'VAT']",Rob Waugh,Updated 13 June 2024 at 9:43 pm·7-min read,13,June,2024,09:43:00,7,"From 'purdah' to 'first past the post', every election in the UK is surrounded by specialist jargon that can leave some voters struggling to fully understand the conversation around them.In the 2024 election, certain phrases – such as the 'triple lock plus' – have also become defining issues, with the terms bandied about by politicians on both sides.Below, we've defined some of the most widely used and confusing terms around British elections (and the 2024 election in particular).Absentee ballotIf people can’t get to a polling station on election day, they can apply for an absent vote.There are two kinds: a postal vote, where a ballot is mailed in, and a proxy vote, where someone else votes for you.At the 2019 general election, 17.2% of voters across the UK used a postal ballot and 0.6% appointed a proxy.Ballot boxThe box where people put their voting slips. The term is also sometimes used to refer to the election itself, as in ‘they could not win at the ballot box’.CampaignThe time before an election in which politicians persuade people to vote for them. In the case of the 2024 election in the UK, parliament was dissolved on the 30 May and the election will take place on 4 July.CanvassingGoing round a particular area trying to persuade people to vote for one party or the other.In UK elections, this is often done by volunteers knocking on people’s doors.Capital gains taxCapital gains tax is a tax on profit when people sell assets that have increased in value.In the 2024 election, the Conservatives have promised that landlords who sell to sitting tenants will be spared capital gains tax on the proceeds, while Labour has left the door open to raising capital gains.Child benefitChild benefit is a benefit paid to parents with children under 16 (or under 20 in approved education or training).The Conservatives have promised to increase the threshold at which high earners start to lose the benefit from £60,000 to £120,000.Sir Keir Starmer, like the Conservatives, has pledged not to raise VAT. (Photo by Stefan Rousseau/PA Images via Getty Images)CoalitionA coalition government is a government formed jointly by more than one political party (for example, by the Liberal Democrats and Conservatives in 2010).ConstituencyThe geographical area that is represented by each MP in the House of Commons.ECHRThe European Convention on Human Rights (ECHR) is an international convention which protects human rights in Europe.The Conservative manifesto stopped short of promising to withdraw from the ECHR, which would have made plans such as the plan to deport migrants to Rwanda easier.Exit pollA poll conducted outside polling stations just after people have voted on election day.On election day, the results of Britain’s exit poll are published just after polls close at 10pm and tend to give a more accurate prediction of the result than previous polls produced throughout the campaign.First past the postThe first past the post system is used to elect MPs to the House of Commons.The candidate with the most votes in each constituency becomes MP, and the party with the most MPs becomes the government.This can mean that the winning party actually has a minority of votes cast: in 2019, the Conservatives had 43.6% of the vote.Hung parliamentA hung parliament is where no party has enough seats to form an overall majority. For example, both the 2010 election and 2017 elections resulted in hung parliament.In 2010, the Conservatives formed a coalition with the Liberal Democrats, while in 2017, the Conservatives formed a minority government with a 'confidence and supply' agreement with the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP).Income tax thresholdThe thresholds between the tax-free allowance, basic rate tax and higher rates of tax.Both parties have said they will continue the freeze on income tax thresholds brought in under the Conservatives, which means people pay more tax as more and more people are pushed into higher tax brackets if wages rise.MajorityA party with a majority – more than half of the seats in the House of Commons – has won the election.The number of votes by which an individual MP wins a constituency is also referred to as their majority.ManifestoPolitical parties publish manifestos before a general election, with a set of policies that the party stands for and aims to implement if elected.Manifesto pledges are not legally binding.Marginal seatA seat in which the incumbent MP won by a small majority, meaning a swing is more likely than in a so-called ‘safe seat’ where the MP had a large majority.Net zeroThe UK Government has set a goal for Britain’s emissions to reach net zero – where emission and removal of greenhouse gases reaches equilibrium – by 2050.All major parties are expected to stick to this goal, barring Reform UK.Opinion pollAn opinion poll is a research survey (usually carried out on a representative sample of the electorate) to gauge likely results in an election.Poll‘The polls’ refers to the places where people vote in an election: exit polls and opinion polls refer to two kinds of survey used to predict election results.Postal voteAn absentee vote where the vote is sent in by post.At the 2019 general election, 17.2% of voters across the UK used a postal ballot.Proxy voteA vote where a person who can’t make it to the booth appoints someone to vote for them.In the 2019 election, 0.6% of voters appointed a proxy.PsephologyPsephology is the scientific study of elections and voting and is used to predict and analyse election results.Polling dayThe day when the country places their vote: in the UK 2024 election, this is July 4.PurdahBefore British elections, the country enters purdah, officially known as the ‘pre-election period of sensitivity’.Purdah means that politicians (both local and national) and other people such as civil servants face restrictions on what they can do and announce.Ministers who remain in office can’t announce new funding, or new policies, or anything which might sway voters or make the government more popular.The idea is that public money cannot be spent on the election.Spoiled ballotA ballot paper which has been marked wrongly (for instance with a vote for more than one candidate) will not be counted.Sometimes people spoil ballots deliberately as a protest vote to show dissatisfactionSwing‘Swing’ is the change in voter support for a political party between one election and the next.It is used to analyse the performance of parties in different areas.Tax burdenThe tax burden refers to the total amount of taxes paid by a group (in this case the UK as a whole) as a proportion of total income.The tax burden is currently at its highest in 70 years according to the OECD.The Equality ActThe 2010 Equality Act protects people against discrimination in Britain.The Conservatives want to ‘tweak’ the Act so that sex-based protections only apply on the basis of someone’s biological sex.Triple lockThe triple lock is a guarantee introduced to the state pension in 2010 so it would not lose value in real terms.The guarantee means that the state pension will rise by the highest out of average earnings, inflation as measured by the consumer price index (CPI) or 2.5%.Triple lock plusThe ‘triple lock plus’ is a Conservative policy, which would see the tax-free pension allowance rise every year in line with the triple lock of average wages, inflation, or 2.5% – whichever is highest, to prevent pensioners being pulled into paying income tax.TurnoutTurnout refers to the percentage of people eligible to vote who turn out to vote on election day.In the 2019 election, for example, 67.3% of those eligible turned out to vote.VATValue added tax is added to goods and services sold by VAT-registered companies, and is the third-largest source of government income after income tax and national insurance.Both Labour and the Conservatives have pledged not to raise VAT.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
Yahoo News UK,"Who is Keir Starmer? The man tipped as next PM vows to 'rebuild Britain'Everything you need to know about the man who, on current poll ratings, is set to be the UK’s next prime minister","['His early life', 'His family', 'His parents', 'His education', 'Why is he a sir?', 'Starmer on... the NHS', 'Starmer on… immigration', 'Starmer on... the cost of living crisis', 'Starmer on... private schools', 'Starmer on… the House of Lords']",Hannah Fearn,Updated 23 May 2024 at 6:59 pm·7-min read,23,May,2024,06:59:00,7,"The son of a toolmaker and the first of his family to go to university, Sir Keir Starmer is the most working class Labour Party leader in a generation.Yet when focus groups are asked what they think his favourite drink is, they guess that he’s partial to a gin and tonic rather than a pint down the local boozer. Many also assume his title is hereditary.So what do you really need to know about the man who, on current poll ratings, is set to be the UK’s next prime minister?His early lifeStarmer was born in Southwark, south London, in 1962, as the second of four children. His parents were Labour Party members and named him after Keir Hardie, the party’s first leader in parliament.The family moved out of the capital and he grew up in Hurst Green, a village just outside the small Surrey town of Oxted. He was active in youth politics from his teenage years but was also a skilled musician, taking music lessons alongside Norman Cook, who later became better known as a member of The Housemartins and the DJ Fatboy Slim.Starmer played the flute, piano, violin and recorder and was a junior exhibitioner at the Guildhall School of Music and Drama.His familyStarmer is married to Victoria, a former solicitor who later retrained in occupational health and now works for the NHS. The pair met through their work in the law in the early 2000s and married in Essex in 2007.She was first seen accompanying her husband when the couple were filmed clapping for carers during the pandemic in 2020 outside their home in Camden. They have two children, a son and daughter, but both are kept out of the public eye.Victoria's father was Jewish and originally came from Poland, while her mother converted when they got married. Starmer has said in a previous interview that ""my wife in particular wants our children to know the faith of her family"" and that they ""observe some of the practices, for example Friday night prayers"".Keir Starmer with parents, Rodney and Josephine, at his graduation. (Twitter/Keir Starmer)His parentsThe Labour leader's father, Rodney Starmer, worked as a toolmaker in a factory, and his mother Josephine Starmer (née Baker), was a nurse.His father worked long, 14-hour days but spent his time outside work caring for Josephine, who was diagnosed with the autoimmune condition Still’s disease. She required two hip and knee replacements twice in her lifetime and struggled with arthritic pain.As a young man Starmer also helped care for his mother, which he has said led to him being more emotionally reserved. His sister, Katy, recalled: “He’s had to be a grown-up all his life. I’ve always been quite open about my feelings – Keir is good at most things, but not that.” Josephine Starmer died in 2015, and his father three years later.His educationStarmer passed the 11-plus examination, and attended Reigate Grammar School from age 11. While he was at the school it became an independent fee-paying institution, but as an existing student he was exempt from fees, and his tuition in the sixth form was covered by a bursary.After school he studied law at the University of Leeds, this first in his family to attend university, graduating with a first class degree in 1985. He undertook postgraduate law studied at the University of Oxford, where he served as editor of a radical magazine, Socialist Alternatives.A photograph of a younger Starmer as shown on ITV's Piers Morgan's Life Stories in 2021. (ITV)Why is he a sir?Stamer was appointed a Knight Commander of the Order of the Bath in 2014 in recognition of his work in the legal profession, culminating in a five-year term as director of public prosecutions (DPP).He first became a barrister in 1987 at the Middle Temple, later joining Doughty Street Chambers and was appointed a Queen’s counsel in 2002, aged just 39. In 2008 he was appointed head of the Crown Prosecution Service and DPP.During his tenure he chose to prosecute three Labour MPs and a Conservative in the wake of the parliamentary expenses scandal, and was responsible for prosecuting former MP Chris Huhne and his ex-wife Vicky Pryce for perverting the course of justice after Pryce claimed responsibility for her former husband’s speeding offence.Starmer on... the NHSThe Labour leader has said that, if elected, his government would “get the NHS working around the clock and pay staff properly to do it”.The remark followed a commitment to provide £1.1bn in funding for the health service to cut waiting lists by paying doctors and nurses to carry out additional out-of-hours care, which would be funded by axing tax breaks for wealthy “non-doms” who hoard money overseas. He added: “The Conservative Party that brought our NHS to its knees will put it in the ground. We have to get it back on its feet.”Starmer describes the NHS as “the crowdfunded solution for all of us”, reinforcing his commitment to healthcare being free at the point of use, but says reform is inevitable or the health service would “remain on life support”. He has pledged to integrate up-to-date technology into every part of the NHS including using artificial intelligence to diagnose disease earlier and more accurately.He supported the doctors strikes, telling ministers: “Don’t break junior doctors, talk to them. Get in the room [and] sort it out.”Starmer with his wife, Lady Victoria Starmer, at the Labour Party Conference in October 2023. (Alamy)Starmer on… immigrationThe government has “lost control of borders”, according to Labour. Starmer has said a Labour government would set up a new policy unit to tackle illegal migration and has suggested that a returns agreement for asylum seekers could be negotiated with the European Union to solve the small boats crisis.He described the government’s thwarted Rwanda plan, which would see illegal migrants deported to the African nation but has to be put into practice due to legal blocks, as a “gimmick” and a “farce” and has promised to reverse it.Starmer on... the cost of living crisisStarmer has sought to keep Rishi Sunak’s handling of the cost of living crisis in the minds of voters by claiming that “his fingerprints are all over their struggling household budgets”. In a letter to his shadow cabinet, leaked to The Guardian, he wrote: “Rishi Sunak is the chief architect of choices prioritising the wealthiest and of the government’s failure to get a grip of the economy and get growth going.”He has said he would prioritise tackling inflation, blaming it for putting up prices and eroding household savings, but has pledged to “take the difficult and responsible decisions” to bring it down.Keir Starmer pictured in 2010, when he was director of public prosecutions, making a statement about MPs who face charges over their expenses claims. (Getty)Starmer on... private schoolsLabour has dropped its early promise to scrap charitable status for private schools, but has committed to levying a 20% VAT rate on school fees removing their “unfair tax break”. The money raised, he said, will be used to address the “appalling state” of the school system for all children.“It’s not an attack on private schools. It’s just saying an exemption you have had is going to go,” he warned private schools who have been critical of the plan – reminding them they are not obliged to pass that tax on to parents in the form of increased fees.Starmer on… the House of LordsWhen he was first Labour leader, Starmer proposed a “root and branch reform of the centre of government… rooting out unearned privilege and addressing unaccountable power”.But his promise to scrap the House of Lords within the first four years of a new parliament – a controversial move that caused a split among his party’s grandees, has been abandoned.Starmer still backs plans for a second chamber “electoral legitimacy”, but as his party nears government he has stepped away from the most radical form of that pledge. He is now reportedly committed to cutting the number of hereditary peers, reducing the size of the chamber and introducing a new appointments process."
Yahoo News UK,"Three important UK election issues, explainedRishi Sunak said his leadership is needed in 'uncertain' times. Keir Starmer said the country needs to be 'rebuilt'. So what issues do voters care about most?","['The economy', 'Health', 'Immigration and asylum']",James Cheng-Morris,Updated 28 May 2024 at 11:11 pm·5-min read,28,May,2024,11:11:00,5,"After months of speculation, Rishi Sunak confirmed the general election will be held on 4 July.The prime minister said Labour leader Sir Keir Starmer could not be trusted to lead the country through “uncertain” times. He made the economy and combating global security the key elements of his pitch to the nation as he announced the election date.In response, Starmer told voters: “Together we can stop the chaos, we can turn the page, we can start to rebuild Britain.”But amid this “uncertainty” and need to “rebuild”, what do the voters consider the key issues?This chart, produced using YouGov polling over the course of this parliament, offers an insight in the issues voters care most about and how that has ebbed and flowed over time.Compared to when Boris Johnson's Tories won the December 2019 poll, the economy, immigration, defence and tax have grown in importance in the eyes of the electorate. This has come amid the cost of living crisis; small boats crossing the English Channel; the onset of the Ukraine war and wider global instability; and the highest tax burden in 70 years.Housing has also become a bigger concern, with the Renters Reform Bill - in which the government pledged to scrap no-fault evictions - having been paused after Sunak called the election.Meanwhile, the last general election was fought - and won by the Tories - on a single issue: Brexit. Yet the chart shows a clear downturn in its relevance among voters, particularly after a trade deal was agreed with the EU in December 2020.This next chart, meanwhile, highlights what voters have considered the top issues over the past year. By a wide margin, the top three are the economy, health and immigration and asylum.Here, Yahoo News UK breaks down what is behind these issues and how they have ebbed and flowed in importance among voters since the last election in 2019.The economyThe unprecedented lockdown called by Boris Johnson in March 2020 meant the public’s attention shifted to the economy, as demonstrated by the huge spike in the chart above. The then-chancellor Rishi Sunak was forced to implement a £70bn furlough scheme, lasting 18 months, to protect people’s jobs.There was a second almighty economic shock - and rise in public concern - in February 2022 following Russia’s invasion of Ukraine. This caused a further spike in an already turbulent wholesale energy market, driving up costs for suppliers and ultimately customers.Average energy bills eventually reached £2,500 a year (and would have exceeded £4,000 had the government not intervened). This was double the £1,278 consumers were paying before the war and by the time this election takes place, people will still be paying much more than this: £1,568.Energy prices were also a key driver in inflation reaching 11.1% - a 41-year high - by October 2022, though it has since fallen to 2.3%, which is near the Bank of England’s 2.0% target.The third economic shock of this parliament - and most damaging for the Tories - was in October 2022 when Liz Truss and Kwasi Kwarteng's disastrous “mini budget”, containing £45bn of unfunded tax cuts, prompted an economic crisis. It led to soaring interest rates, and to this day homeowners who are remortgaging are facing significantly higher bills.HealthHealth, like the economy, is another issue which clearly correlated with the beginning of the pandemic. The above chart shows an enormous spike in public concern when COVID cases started to multiply in March 2020, ultimately leading to the nationwide lockdown as the NHS faced collapse.Cases fell that summer, but spikes in the chart can be seen once infections rose again and fresh nationwide lockdowns were imposed in October 2020 and January 2021. By March 2022, likely as concerns over the Omicron variant faded, there was much less concern about health.In January last year, there was a brief spike as the NHS in England experienced the biggest industrial action in its history, with tens of thousands of nurses and ambulance staff walking out simultaneously.As for the state of play going into the election, NHS waiting lists remain higher than they were when Sunak vowed to cut them last year. According to the latest figures, an estimated 7.54 million treatments were waiting to be carried out at the end of March, relating to 6.29 million patients.Immigration and asylumSince the last election, the immigration and asylum narrative has largely revolved around one issue: small boats crossing the English Channel.The numbers have risen in most of the intervening years: there were 1,843 crossings in 2019, 8,466 in 2020, 28,526 in 2021, 45,774 in 2022 and 29,437 last year. This year, the number has already passed the 10,000 mark.The regular sharp spikes in the above chart demonstrate how frequently crossings have been in the news, including some occasions when hundreds of migrants have made the dangerous journey in a single day.But it also reflects how the government has made this part of its own agenda. It was Boris Johnson’s government which first announced plans to deport migrants to Rwanda in April 2022. That policy was picked up by Rishi Sunak when he became prime minister in October that year, with Sunak since repeating his pledge to “stop the boats”.But after calling the election, Sunak admitted this week that flights would not take off before the country goes to the polls.Read moreFive important laws that could be dropped due to Sunak's snap election (Yahoo News UK)OPINION - Rishi Sunak has been in last-ditch campaign mode for so long — a General Election is logical (Evening Standard)Door open for Boris Johnson to campaign for Tories, Rishi Sunak signals (PA Media)"
Yahoo News UK,Who is Ed Davey? Lib Dem leader attracts attention with election stuntsEverything you need to know about the former minister who has pledged to fight for the NHS.,"['His early life', 'His family', 'His parents', 'His education', 'Why is he a Sir?', 'Davey on... the cost of living crisis', 'Davey on... the NHS', 'Davey on... immigration', 'Davey on... the Post Office scandal']",Hannah Fearn,7 June 2024 at 11:47 pm·6-min read,7,June,2024,11:47:00,6,"Ed Davey has been involved in a number of comedy stunts since the election was called. (Alamy)With the spotlight on prime minister Rishi Sunak and Labour leader Keir Starmer as they prepare to slug it out in a general election campaign, the focus had started slipping from Liberal Democrat leader Ed Davey until a series of stunts put him back in the spotlight.The former coalition government cabinet minister – who lost his seat, punished by voters for getting into bed with the Tories, but then won it back again – is sending a clear message that he should not be overlooked.He’s had a long political career and the climax may still be ahead: if polls continue to shift away from the Conservatives at the current trajectory, there’s a slim possibility that, if the election is held in October, he could end up as leader of the opposition.So what do we know about the man behind the third party in British politics? Hannah Fearn finds out.His early lifeEd Davey was born in Mansfield, Nottinghamshire, on Christmas Day in 1965. He was the youngest of three boys, but lost his father at just four years old and then his mother when he was in his mid-teens. She had spent three years battling cancer, during which time he nursed his mother together with his grandmother and brother Henry.Once a keen Scout and Air Scout, he later remembers feeling “isolated” at school because of his caring responsibilities, which meant he couldn’t take part in after-school activities or sports. “The last 18 months she was bedridden and in a lot of pain. I’d spend hours on the bed, talking to her,” he said. Davey was with his mother when she died at Nottingham General Hospital, after being placed on an unsuited dementia ward.After both his parents had died, Davey was brought up by his maternal grandparents in the village of Eakring, though his grandfather died soon after. He spent much of his childhood and young adulthood close to his grandmother. “First of all, she was looking after me. Then we were looking after each other,” he said.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't sayHis familyDavey married Emily Gasson, a former Liberal Democrat parliamentary candidate who unsuccessfully stood in four elections and is now a councillor, in 2005 and the pair have two children, a son and daughter.Their son, born in 2007 and now a teenager, is disabled with a neurological condition. He has attended special schools but is now educated at home with a tutor – a change that Davey said led to him becoming verbal for the first time. He has spoken about his anxiety about who will care for his son when he and his wife are no longer around. “It’s the thing that worries me more than anything else in my life,” Davey said.Gasson was diagnosed with relapsing-remitting multiple sclerosis in 2012. She was well for many years following her diagnosis, but declined during lockdown and is working on recovering her physical strength.Liberal Democrats election broadcast shows Ed Davey with his son. (Liberal Democrats)His parentsHis father, John, was a solicitor and his mother, Nina, a teacher. Davey has described how he was inspired to study by his mother, who always wanted him to try hard academically and who he wanted to impress.His educationDavey attended the private Nottingham High School, the alma mater of former chancellor Kenneth Clarke. He became head boy, with Labour MP Ed Balls – who was studying in the year below – watching on.After school, he achieved a first class degree in philosophy, politics and economics at Jesus College, Oxford where he was junior common room president. After becoming an economics researcher for the Liberal Democrats he returned to study, reading for a master’s degree in economics at Birkbeck College, London.Ed Davey, pictured with his family. (Liberal Democrats)Why is he a Sir?For three years, the Lib Dem leader was a member of the cabinet in the Tory-Lib Dem coalition government, holding the post of secretary of state for energy and climate change from 2012 to 2015. He was knighted in the 2016 New Year’s Honours for “political and public services”.Davey on... the cost of living crisisDavey has repeatedly attacked the government for failing to curb rapid inflation and the devastating effect it is having on household budgets. He called the Conservative Party “so out of touch they might as well be living on another planet”, and said he warned Jeremy Hunt “people are desperate for real help… but all the chancellor could offer is empty words and unfair tax hikes”.In particular, he has urged more action on food price inflation, which analysis from his own party found had risen 37% in one year for the average weekly supermarket trip. He has promised to end energy hikes and abandoned his plan to add 1p to income tax to save the NHS because ordinary voters can no longer afford it.Davey on... the NHSThe Liberal Democrats have made the NHS a cornerstone of their policy platform for the last five years. In Davey’s words: “Voting Conservative is bad for your health.” He promises to reverse cuts to GP numbers and guarantee a doctor’s appointment when you need one, improve access to NHS dentistry and save lives by tackling ambulance call out delays.Davey blames the care crisis for deepening the problems of the health service and says his party would spend £5bn a year on a “care package” to ensure patients are discharged from hospital more quickly, freeing up bed space. However, there is little detail on how this would be financed without raising taxes on the wealthiest - which Davey has promised not to do in his push to poach disillusioned Tory voters.Sir Ed Davey was a member of the Tory-Lib Dem government. (Reuters)Davey on... immigrationThe Lib Dem leader has been a long-standing advocate for refugee rights and critic of the government’s immigration policy. Davey has called for Conservative plans to deport failed asylum seekers to Rwanda a “cynical distraction” from the Partygate crisis and the money would be better spent on measures to tackle the cost of living crisis. He added: “They’ve provided no evidence to suggest that this new policy will stop illegal smuggling, they’re not cracking down on the organised crime gangs, which is what you need to do.”Davey has called for a new right to work for refugees and asylum seekers, and major reform of the Home Office, which he says is no longer up to the job. After the end of the coalition government in 2015, Davey has said his party “was wrong” to go along with the introduction of a minimum income standard for immigrants. He later described the policy as “nasty and unfair”.Davey on... the Post Office scandalDespite the Post Office scandal that led to the wrongful prosecution of more than 700 subpostmasters crossing the tenure of more than a dozen business secretaries, Davey has recently taken the heat for failing to investigate the issue while he was in the job.It has emerged that while a minister, Davey initially rejected a request to meet justice campaigner Alan Bates, and later accepted it only on the advice that it would be good for his PR. He has recently apologised for not acting earlier, admitting that he is sorry that he “did not see through Post Office lies” about the fault in the Horizon programme."
The Guardian,Far-right National Rally in reach of being dominant French party after election first round,[],Angelique Chrisafis in Paris,1 July 2024 at 2:58 am·5-min read,1,July,2024,02:58:00,5,"Marine Le Pen’s far-right, anti-immigration party is in reach of becoming the biggest political force in the French parliament after a historically high showing in the first round of snap parliament elections.The left and centrists immediately began to call for tactical voting to try to stop the far-right before next Sunday’s final round runoff, after exit polls indicated the National Rally (RN) had won about 34% of the national vote share with the leftwing alliance in second place and Emmanuel Macron’s grouping trailing in a distant third.The RN took about 12m votes – almost three times the 4.2m it took in the last parliamentary election in 2022.Related: Unease and fear in France as Le Pen’s National Rally leads in exit pollsSpeaking after the polls had closed, Le Pen said French people had shown “in an unambiguous vote … their wish to turn the page on seven years of the disdainful and corrosive [presidency]” of Macron. The president’s centrists, she said, had been almost “wiped out” by the RN, which was now hoping to increase its 88 seats in parliament to a majority of 289.This is still seen as a steep challenge, but if it happens in next Sunday’s decisive second round of voting, it will be the first time in French history that a far-right party has won a parliamentary election and forms a government. In that scenario, Macron – who called the election three weeks ago after losing to the RN in the European elections – would have to share power.Equally, the RN could win the largest number of seats but fall short of a majority. Macron could then find himself with a hung parliament unable to govern the EU’s second biggest economy and its top military power.The New Popular Front (NFP), a leftwing coalition formed in an attempt to hold back the far right, was thought to have taken about 29% of the vote share.“We have one week to stop the far right coming to power, all progressives and humanists … have to mobilise behind the New Popular Front,” said Clémentine Autain of the leftwing France Unbowed party before the second-round election race next week.Macron’s centrist alliance fared badly, with exit polls showing it having won between 20.5% and 23% of the vote. It was the biggest grouping in parliament, but it could now could lose more than half of its seats and be relegated to third place.The national vote share indicates the broad trend of voting, but does not predict the exact makeup of the 577-seat parliament, which will only become clear in the final round on 7 July. Most constituencies will now go to runoffs.On Sunday night, Jordan Bardella, Le Pen’s protege and party president, said he wanted to be the “prime minister of all the French”. But in cities such as Paris, Lyon, Lille, Nantes and Strasbourg thousands took part in street demonstrations against his party. Large crowds gathered at the Place de la République in the capital, where leading figures in the left alliance spoke out against the far right.The RN’s chances of winning power will depend on the political dealmaking made by its rivals over the coming days. In the past, the traditional right and leftwing parties have struck agreements to stand down candidates from the runoffs to avoid splitting the vote against the RN. But the tactical voting strategy known as the “republican front” to block the RN is less certain than ever.In a written statement, Macron called on voters to rally behind candidates who are “clearly republican and democratic”, which, based on his recent declarations, would exclude candidates from the RN and from Jean-Luc Mélenchon’s France Unbowed, but not candidates representing the NFP’s more moderate leftwing parties.In an address, the prime minister, Gabriel Attal, echoed that appeal, saying that with the RN at the gates of power, runoff candidates in third place should withdraw. “Not one single vote must go to the National Rally … The stakes are clear: to prevent the National Rally from having an absolute majority,” he said.Mélenchon said the left alliance would withdraw all its candidates who came third in the first round, saying: “Our guideline is simple and clear: not a single more vote for the National Rally.”Several RN MPs were elected in the first round, including Marine Le Pen. In northern France, one of the most popular figures on the French left – the head of the Communist party, Fabien Roussel – was knocked out in the first round by the RN candidate, Guillaume Florquin.The turnout of more than 69% was the highest in almost 40 years in an increasingly polarised country, where Macron had said that a win by either the far right or hard left could lead to “civil war” in France.For decades, the Front National party co-founded by Le Pen’s father, Jean-Marie Le Pen, was regarded as a danger to democracy that promoted racist, antisemitic and anti-Muslim views. Centrist and leftwing politicians attempted to remind voters of the history of the 52-year-old party, which at its start included in its ranks former members of a Waffen-SS military unit under Nazi command during the second world war. But the renamed party surged after Marine Le Pen’s years-long public relations drive to normalise its policies and detoxify its image.The anti-immigration party has, however, kept its traditional doctrine once known as “France for the French”, or “national preference”, which it has renamed “national priority”. It means that French citizens would, if the RN were in power, be given priority over non-nationals for jobs, social welfare assistance and housing. The party has pledged to bar dual nationals from certain strategic state jobs in France. It wants to scrap nationality rights for children born and raised in France by foreign parents.Macron stunned and bewildered his own government and supporters with his decision this month to dissolve parliament and call snap elections after his centrist, pro-European grouping was trounced by the RN in EU elections. He argued that he was calling the vote to “clarify” the French political landscape."
The Guardian,Voter turnout in France’s parliamentary election at near-40-year high,[],Ashifa Kassam,30 June 2024 at 11:53 pm·5-min read,30,June,2024,11:53:00,5,"Voter turnout across France has surged to a near four-decade high as voters cast their ballots in the first round of high stakes, snap parliamentary elections that could lead to the far-right party of Marine Le Pen forming a government in a historic first.While polls suggest support for Le Pen’s far-right, anti-immigrant National Rally (RN) has strengthened in recent days, the outcome of the two-round election, called three weeks ago by the president, Emmanuel Macron, following the crushing defeat of his allies in the European parliamentary elections, remains highly uncertain.With three hours remaining until polls closed on Sunday, voter turnout had reached 59.39% – an increase of nearly 20 points compared with the 2022 elections, according to the interior ministry. Turnout is estimated to be the highest since the 1986 legislative vote, the research director for Ipsos France, Mathieu Gallard, told Reuters.The high turnout is likely to mean that many more third-place candidates will make it to the second round of the election, Mujtaba Rahman, Eurasia Group’s managing director for Europe, said on social media. “Why does that matter? It allows Left and the Macron centre to make deals to withdraw (the) worst-placed candidates and allow the others a free run against the Far Right candidate in Round 2,” he wrote.The outcome of these tactical alliances could decide whether the RN “approaches” a majority in the second round, he added.In the lead-up to Sunday’s election, one poll carried out for Les Echos newspaper suggested that the RN was on course to win 37% of the national vote, up two points from more than a week ago, while another poll carried out for BFM TV estimated the far-right party could win between 260 and 295 seats – potentially giving it an outright majority among France’s 577 constituencies.Related: Macron told ‘people detest you’ as far-right bids to be biggest party in FrancePolls suggest the New Popular Front (NFP), a broad but fragile leftwing alliance, could receive 28% of the vote while Macron’s centrist bloc trails behind at 20%.Official campaigning for the first-round vote ended at midnight on Friday. Following Sunday’s vote, campaigning will resume on Monday for a further five days before voters are called back to the polls for a final, decisive second-round ballot on 7 July.Much could change in the five days between rounds, particularly if candidates embrace tactical alliances and withdrawals in order to block the far-right from winning a majority.In recent days, candidates from the leftwing coalition and Macron’s centrist alliance have scrambled to remind voters that the RN, launched in the early 1970s as the National Front, once included in its ranks former members of a Waffen-SS military unit under Nazi command during the second world war.The party was long seen as rife with antisemitic, homophobic and racist views, and widely regarded as a danger to democracy that needed to be kept out of mainstream politics. While Marine Le Pen, Jean-Marie Le Pen’s daughter, has spent much of the past decade working to soften the party’s image, its core message remains one of deep hostility to immigration and the so-called Islamisation of society.The party has vowed to drastically slash immigration and bar dual nationals from certain state jobs, along with promises to cut taxes on energy, exempt people under the age of 30 from income tax and work towards abolishing Macron’s pension reform.Ahead of Sunday’s first round, Le Pen urged voters to go out and vote. “Victory is within our grasp, so let’s seize this historic opportunity and get out and vote!” she wrote on social media.Most analysts suggest the most likely outcome is a polarised parliament, where consensus between the larger far-right and leftwing blocs, and a smaller number of Macron’s allies would be nearly impossible, leading to political paralysis.If the RN wins a majority, the party chief, Jordan Bardella, Le Pen’s 28-year-old protege who has no governing experience, could become prime minister in a fraught cohabitation with Macron.The result could pit the two men – who have vastly different visions of France’s future – against each other. One example is France’s strong support for Ukraine, championed by Macron since Russia’s 2022 invasion. Bardella has said he would use his powers as prime minister to stop Macron from continuing to supply long-range weapons to Ukraine.Following Sunday’s first-round vote, Macron is planning to convene a government meeting to decide the further course of action, government sources told AFP.The president’s shock decision to call parliamentary elections has sparked dissent among his allies and cast Europe’s second-biggest economy into uncertainty. Even so, Macron has stood by his decision, reportedly hoping it will force voters to confront whether they are ready to allow the far-right to tighten its grip on power.In the lead-up to Sunday’s first round vote, Macron sought to hammer home this point, warning that France risked being plunged into a “civil war” if either of his “extreme” opponents won a majority.The president has insisted he will serve out the remainder of his second term until 2027, regardless of which party wins."
The Telegraph,"Putin wants Labour election victory, claims Sunak",[],Daniel Martin,1 July 2024 at 5:00 am·5-min read,1,July,2024,05:00:00,5,"Rishi Sunak has told voters that Vladimir Putin is hoping for a Labour victory as the general election campaign enters its final week.Speaking to The Telegraph, the Prime Minister said the UK’s staunch support for Ukraine meant that “Russia does not want us to be re-elected”.In a final appeal to stave off a Labour super-majority, he also accused Nigel Farage, the Reform UK leader, of “appeasing” Moscow, and claimed that Sir Keir Starmer would cut defence spending “on day one”.Mr Sunak said: “The Conservatives have stood up to our adversaries to protect British interests and British values time and time again. We have stood shoulder to shoulder with Ukraine against Russian aggression, and we will keep doing so if re-elected.“It is clear from the evidence Russia does not want us to be re-elected. Putin would like nothing more than for Britain to step back, to appease his aggression rather than face it down, and that is what will happen with another party in power.“Nigel Farage has talked of appeasing Russia, which will only play into Putin’s hands, and Labour will cut UK defence spending on day one. This will embolden our enemies and send a signal to our allies that Britain is not with them any more. We cannot allow that to happen. Vote Conservative on July 4.”His last-minute intervention came amid reports that Russia was attempting to bolster Reform’s prospects with a coordinated social media campaign.The Australian Broadcasting Corporation claimed to have uncovered a network of five Facebook pages “spreading Kremlin talking points” ahead of the election, with some encouraging support for Mr Farage’s party.It is understood that Richard Holden, the Conservative chairman, has written to Simon Case, Britain’s top civil servant, and Sir Tim Barrow, the national security adviser, urging them to investigate.Polls show the Tories heading for a landmark defeat. They go into Thursday’s election 20 points behind Labour, and face being reduced to just 100 seats. The intervention is a sign of a change of policy at Conservative headquarters, moving from ignoring the threat posed by Reform to attacking Mr Farage’s party.On Saturday night, the Reform leader was embarrassed by a stunt from Led by Donkeys, a campaign group, when a banner featuring a smiling Putin and the phrase “I [heart] Nigel” dropped down behind him on stage.Mr Farage dismissed claims that Russian-inspired bots were interfering in the election as “cobblers”.The Tories are also keen to highlight what they see as Labour’s failings on defence. Although Sir Keir’s party has pledged to increase defence spending to 2.5 per cent of national income, it has not – unlike the Conservatives – put a date on it.Interviewed by the BBC’s Laura Kuenssberg on Sunday, Pat McFadden, Labour’s election coordinator, was unable to explain why the party had not made the commitment on defence but had done so on other issues.Oliver Dowden, the Deputy Prime Minister, warned voters of “buyer’s remorse” if they allowed a Labour election victory, telling Sky News: “What I would say is just think, think in six months time how you’re going to feel. I have a strong feeling the shine is going to come off Labour pretty quickly.“The buyer’s remorse will set in, and the bigger the Labour majority, the bigger the buyer’s remorse. Everyone still has it in their hands to stop that. Mark my words – dogs bark, cats meow, Labour put up taxes.”Mr Dowden went on to say the alleged Facebook plot was a “classic example” of Russian interference, adding that “hostile state actors” – with Russia as a “prime example” – had been attempting to influence the outcome of the election.Asked whether he was accusing Putin of backing Mr Farage, he told Sunday With Trevor Phillips, on Sky News: “There is a threat in all elections – and indeed we see it in this election – from hostile state actors seeking to influence the outcome of the election campaign. Russia is a prime example of this, and this is a classic example from the Russian playbook.”The pages uncovered by ABC, with a combined following of 190,000, are said to bear “the hallmarks of a Russian influence operation”. The broadcaster said they featured criticism of several political parties including the Conservatives and Labour, with some expressing support for Mr Farage and two reportedly describing him as “the people’s champion”.On Monday, Mr Sunak will warn that an unchecked Labour government “would be a disaster from which it would take decades to recover”.Speaking at a rally, he will say: “We have four days to save Britain from a Labour government. Labour would hike taxes by more than £2,000 for every working family, would shunt our politics to the Left and change the rules to ensure that they can stay in power for decades.“If they get the kind of majority, the super-majority that the polls suggest, they will set about entrenching themselves in power. They will rewrite the rules to make it easier for them to stay in office and harder for anyone to replace them. So don’t surrender your voice to Labour on Thursday.“I tell you this – once you have handed Keir Starmer and Labour a blank cheque, you won’t be able to get it back. A Labour government would be bad for our country, and an unchecked Labour government would be a disaster from which it would take decades to recover.”Meanwhile, Sir Keir will embark on a three-day tour of the country in a final bid to persuade voters to back Labour. Mr McFadden said: “This week, people across the country face a clear choice – five more years of chaos with the Conservatives, or Keir Starmer’s changed Labour Party offering to turn the page and start to rebuild.“If people don’t want to wake up on July 5 to five more years of economic chaos, to wake up knowing that all the future offers is the same as the recent Tory past, then they have to vote Labour and vote for change on Thursday. Change will only come if you vote Labour on July 4.”"
Yahoo News UK,"Will Nigel Farage's Reform UK 'beat' the Tories in the election?With some polling figures putting the Tories and Reform UK nearly neck and neck, could Farage's party really end up with nearly as many MPs as Sunak's?","['What do the latest polls say?', 'Could Reform UK get more MPs than the Tories?', 'Could the Lib Dems be the official opposition party?', 'What is proportional representation?']",James Cheng-Morris and  Ellen Manning,Updated 14 June 2024 at 6:33 pm·7-min read,14,June,2024,06:33:00,7,"Leading pollster John Curtice has poured cold water on suggestions that Reform UK is now beating the Conservative Party in the general election polls.As representatives from seven parties took prepared to take part in a TV debate on Thursday, a YouGov survey for The Times newspaper said Reform’s support had increased by two points to 19%, putting them ahead of the Tories for the first time.Reform UK leader Nigel Farage took the the opportunity to hail the poll results in the debate, declaring: “We are now the opposition to Labour.”But Curtice urged caution, insisting that single polls should not be relied on. He told Radio 4's Today programme: ""This is one poll - we’ve actually, I think, had four other polls published in the last 24 hours - none of which have had Reform ahead, not even all of which have had Reform gaining ground, but quite a couple of them certainly suggesting it’s also got very close.""He said it may not be the case that Reform are ahead - and could be on average four or five points behind. But he said: ""This is still bad news for the Conservatives. The only way Rishi Sunak can hope to get even to base camp in narrowing the lead that Labour have started off with this campaign was to squeeze the Reform vote.""He added: ""Rather than making progress, things are actually going backwards, not least of course because of Nigel Farage’s decision to fight this campaign.""With many speculating that Reform UK with Farage at the helm could ""beat"" the Tories, Yahoo News UK takes a look.What do the latest polls say?YouGov’s voting intention tracker, updated on Tuesday, suggests the Tories and Reform UK are neck and neck.With Labour well ahead on 38%, the Tories are trailing on 18% – compared to a high of 53% under Boris Johnson in 2020 – with Reform UK just behind on 17% and the Liberal Democrats on 15%.However, there are multiple polls taking place at any one time by a number of different companies.According to the PA news agency, an average of all polls that were carried out wholly or partly during the seven days to June 13 puts Labour on 43%, 21 points ahead of the Conservatives on 22%, followed by Reform on 14%, the Lib Dems on 10% and the Greens on 6%.And while Reform’s average is up one percentage point on the figure for the previous week and the Tories are down one point, there is still an eight-point gap, on average, between the two.Could Reform UK get more MPs than the Tories?Unless something remarkable happens, in short: 'No' - and that's because of the first past the post (FPTP) voting system in which the candidate with the largest number of votes in their constituency is elected.According to the Electoral Reform Society, which is against FPTP, this system leads to a situation where “even if millions of voters support the same party, if they are thinly spread out across the UK they may only get the largest number of votes in a couple of these contests – so only win a few MPs"".“Tens of thousands of voters supporting a different party, but who live near each other, could end up with more MPs. This means the number of MPs a party has in parliament rarely matches their popularity with the public.”Rishi Sunak on the campaign trail on Wednesday. (AFP via Getty Images)Farage knows this well. As the leader of UKIP in the 2015 election, he saw his party win 12.6% of the nationwide vote and one seat. The Liberal Democrats won 7.9% of the vote... and eight seats.Indeed, YouGov last week released a poll – put together using the multi-level regression and post-stratification (MRP) surveying technique, from a sample size of nearly 60,000 respondents – which suggested the Tories would win just 140 seats, having won 365 in 2019. But this is still 140 more than the zero it projected Reform UK to win, in spite of its strong polling figures.The model had Reform UK ""performing strongly in a number of seats but still a long way off winning in any"", with projected second-placed finishes in 27 constituencies.YouGov's MRP projection. (YouGov)Granted, this model was formed between 24 May and 1 June, before Farage's headline-grabbing intervention on Monday last week in which he announced he would be standing as an MP.But, even as Reform UK polls closer than ever to the Tories, it's difficult to imagine the party winning more than a handful of seats.Chris Hopkins, director at polling firm Savanta, told Yahoo News UK that in one respect, Reform UK is at an advantage compared to Ukip in 2015 because ""Ukip took votes from both Labour and the Conservatives, and we are not seeing that with Reform UK – they are all coming from the Conservatives.""That is the consequence of Rishi Sunak making immigration a centrepiece of the campaign and failing to deliver on it. Even if you have voters that are neutral on immigration, they would say the small boats policy has been a disaster.""But even so, Hopkins said, Reform UK is still ""at a huge electoral disadvantage"" in that its votes are not very concentrated, they are very evenly spread.""There are going to be some races where Reform UK is strong - the Nigel Farage factor in Clacton is really interesting - but realistically its ceiling is five seats: and that’s a high ceiling.""Could the Lib Dems be the official opposition party?Liberal Democrat leader Sir Ed Davey on a campaign visit in Henley-in-Arden, Warwickshire, on Wednesday. (PA)Like Reform UK, Sir Ed Davey’s Liberal Democrats are performing well in the polls.In a sign of how defensive the Tory campaign is becoming, one online party advert claims voting for Reform UK or the Lib Dems could give Labour 100 extra seats, resulting in the biggest majority in its history.It depicts a scenario where the Conservatives are beaten into third place behind the Lib Dems, with just 57 seats, despite getting 19% of the vote and without Reform winning a single seat.Read more: Pollsters got it wrong in 2015, so could Labour’s lead be overestimated? (The Guardian)However, it remains unlikely the Lib Dems will finish second. YouGov’s MRP poll projected the party performing strongly, winning 48 seats. This would be up 37 from 2019, but still nowhere near the Tories’ projected 140.However, amid all this talk about projections, it’s worth remembering they are still only polls and not a definite indicator of how people will vote on 4 July. The 1992 and 2015 elections are notable examples of how polling didn’t match the end results of Tory wins.What is proportional representation?Proportional representation, as defined by the UK parliament, is an electoral system ""in which the distribution of seats corresponds closely with the proportion of the total votes cast for each party. For example, if a party gained 40% of the total votes, a perfectly proportional system would allow them to gain 40% of the seats.""This differs from the first past the post system, as set out above, in that a relatively high vote share rarely corresponds with increased seats for the smaller parties. In 2019, for example, the Lib Dems won 11.5% of the vote but only 1.7% – 11 – of the 650 seats.Unsurprisingly, both Reform UK and the Lib Dems support proportional representation.The Lib Dems this week made it part of their manifesto, with the party saying it would introduce the single transferrable vote method, a form of proportional representation which allows electors to rank their preference of candidates on the ballot.The party previously sought to change the UK’s voting system while in the coalition government under then-leader Nick Clegg, but voters rejected the plan in a 2011 referendum.Keir Starmer profile: The toolmakers' son vowing to 'rebuild Britain'Rishi Sunak profile: The PM battling to stay in power of election gambleHow to register to vote in the 2024 general electionWhich MPs are standing down before the next election? Full list mappedThe key issues that will decide the electionWhen is the first UK general election TV debate?What is purdah? The strict rule that governs what politicians can and can't say"
